Illinois, session 104th, HB5605.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Community Supported Living Arrangement Services Act. 6    Section 2. Findings; purpose. 7    (a) Findings. 8    (1) Risk of institutionalization and waiver gaps.9        (A) Many individuals with developmental disabilities 10    in Illinois, particularly individuals with intense 11    physical, medical, or behavioral support needs, are 12    institutionalized because their complex needs cannot be 13    met through Illinois' current home and community-based 14    service system. Other individuals remain at significant 15    risk of institutionalization due to gaps in available home 16    and community-based services and supports. As reflected in 17    recent national data, as of the most recent reporting 18    period, 16 states and the District of Columbia operate no 19    state-run developmental disability institutions, and the 20    majority of remaining states serve fewer than 500 21    individuals in such settings, demonstrating the 22    feasibility of serving individuals with complex support 23    needs in community-based settings when appropriate   HB5605- 2 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    services are available.2        (B) Unnecessary institutionalization violates federal 3    law, departs from generally accepted national standards 4    and research-documented best practices for supporting 5    individuals with developmental disabilities to obtain 6    quality of life outcomes and results in higher public 7    costs on average than home and community-based services. 8    In Illinois, the average annual cost of placement in a 9    State-operated developmental center, the most restrictive 10    and least preferred setting, exceeds $320,000 per 11    individual, compared to approximately $71,328 per 12    individual for services delivered through the Illinois 13    Adults with Developmental Disabilities Home and 14    Community-Based Services Waiver and other services from 15    the Medicaid state plan.16        (C) Existing Developmental Disabilities Division Home 17    and Community-Based Service waivers in Illinois are not 18    designed to meet the needs of individuals with complex 19    medical, physical, or behavioral support requirements, and 20    do not consistently reflect recognized best practices 21    identified through national research and quality 22    frameworks, including work by the University of 23    Minnesota's Institute on Community Integration and by the 24    Council on Quality and Leadership. These limitations 25    contribute to the continued "placement" of individuals 26    with complex needs in more restrictive and costly   HB5605- 3 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    institutional settings, while reducing the funding 2    available to add community infrastructure and to address 3    the waiting list.4        (D) Assessment tools developed primarily for 5    institutional or congregate service delivery models and 6    grounded in a deficit-based or medical model, may 7    systematically underestimate the support needs of 8    individuals with complex medical, physical, or behavioral 9    conditions who seek to live in their own homes and 10    participate in community life, increasing the risk of 11    service gaps and unnecessary institutionalization. The use 12    of modern, validated assessment tools that measure support 13    intensity and health and safety risk, including structured 14    instruments such as the Health Risk Screening Tool and 15    other validated tools, is necessary to accurately identify 16    medical, behavioral, and supervision risks and the 17    supports and services to address them relevant to safe and 18    inclusive community living.19        (E) Behavioral assessment findings are frequently 20    documented but not meaningfully incorporated into 21    eligibility determinations or service authorization 22    decisions within Illinois' existing waiver structure. The 23    absence of clear statutory direction requiring 24    consideration of documented behavioral acuity contributes 25    to service denials, prolonged waiting periods, caregiver 26    collapse, crisis intervention, and unnecessary   HB5605- 4 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    institutional placement.2        (F) Federal Medicaid law and guidance do not approve 3    or require the use of any specific assessment instrument 4    but instead require that assessment methodologies 5    accurately identify individual need and support compliance 6    with health, welfare, and community integration 7    requirements.8        (G) Inaccurate or incomplete assessment of individual 9    support needs increases the likelihood of service gaps, 10    family caregiving burden, emergency interventions, 11    hospitalization, crisis placement, and 12    institutionalization, resulting in higher long-term public 13    costs and poorer self-determination, health, and quality 14    of life outcomes for individuals.15        (H) Federal statutes, regulations and guidance require 16    access to integrated community-based services and supports 17    that promote autonomy, dignity, and quality of life 18    outcomes, including but not limited to:19            (i) the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) (42 20        U.S.C. 12101 et seq.);21            (ii) Olmstead v. L.C., 527 U.S. 581 (1999);22            (iii) Ligas v. Maram Consent Decree (N.D. Ill. 23        2011);24            (iv) the federal Home and Community-Based Service 25        Settings and Person-Centered Planning Rule (79 Fed. 26        Reg. 2947; 42 CFR 441.301(c), 441.710);  HB5605- 5 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1            (v) the 2024 enhanced integration mandate under 2        Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act; and 3            (vi) the 2024 Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 4        Services Home and Community-Based Services Final Rule. 5        (I) Federal deinstitutionalization transition 6    programs, including Money Follows the Person, which 7    provides a fiscal incentive to states with an enhanced 8    federal Medicaid match for 365 days following an 9    individual's transition from an institutional setting, 10    exist to support individuals with developmental 11    disabilities and complex support needs in moving to 12    integrated community-based services, including assistance 13    with transition-related costs such as rental deposits, 14    home furnishings, and other allowable start-up expenses. 15    Failure to fully utilize these transition authorities 16    represents a missed opportunity to reduce institutional 17    reliance, increase cost-effective community living options 18    and quality of life outcomes, and advance compliance with 19    federal integration mandates.20        (J) This Act is intended to be implemented in a manner 21    consistent with federal Medicaid statute and regulations 22    governing Home and Community-Based Services waivers, 23    including requirements applicable to services authorized 24    under Section 1915(c) of the Social Security Act.25    (2) Legal and policy foundations for community supported 26living arrangements.   HB5605- 6 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        (A) Statutory authority.2            (i) Medicaid Home and Community-Based Services 3        were authorized by Congress in 1981 under Section 4        1915(c) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 5        1396n(c)) to permit states, subject to federal 6        approval, to furnish community-based services as an 7        alternative to institutional care for individuals who 8        would otherwise require an institutional level of 9        care. Illinois applied for and received federal 10        approval for its Home and Community-Based Services 11        waiver serving adults with developmental disabilities 12        in 1989.13            (ii) The Section 1915(c) Home and Community-Based 14        Services authority was implemented through federal 15        regulations at 42 CFR Part 441 beginning in 1985 and is 16        administered by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 17        Services (CMS). In 1990, Congress enacted the 18        Community Supported Living Arrangements Act as an 19        amendment to the Medicaid Home and Community-Based 20        Services statute, expanding the menu of permissible 21        waiver services to explicitly recognize Community 22        Supported Living Arrangements as a service option, for 23        the first time separating Medicaid funding for 24        community living supports from housing and facilities. 25        Following this statutory amendment, CMS issued service 26        definitions and guidance enabling states to implement   HB5605- 7 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        Community Supported Living Arrangements services 2        within approved 1915(c) waivers.3            States have since implemented Community Supported 4        Living Arrangements services to support individuals 5        with developmental disabilities in living in their own 6        homes, apartments, family homes, or other integrated 7        community-based residential settings, consistent with 8        nationally recognized best practices promoted by the 9        National Association of State Directors of 10        Developmental Disabilities Services.11            (iii) Community Supported Living Arrangements 12        Services are an addition to the services that may be 13        funded under Medicaid Home and Community-Based 14        Services waivers. Community Supported Living 15        Arrangements services are not a funding mechanism and 16        are distinct from self-directed service models, 17        including Illinois Home-Based Services. Community 18        Supported Living Arrangements services are intended to 19        operate as certified and provider-delivered, 20        accountable residential support services with 21        accountability for staffing, service delivery, and 22        health and welfare protections in the individual's own 23        home, including their family's home and not in a 24        licensed facility.25            (iv) Home and community-based services authorized 26        under Section 1915(c) are administered and overseen by   HB5605- 8 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services 2        pursuant to 42 CFR Part 441, which requires compliance 3        with person-centered planning, health and welfare 4        assurances, provider qualifications, service quality, 5        and community integration standards.6        (B) Federal regulations and integration standards.7            (i) The 2014 CMS Home and Community-Based Services 8        Settings Rule (79 Fed. Reg. 2947, January 16, 2014; 42 9        CFR 441.301(c)(4)-(5)) requires that services be 10        provided in community-integrated settings that respect 11        individual informed choice, privacy, autonomy, and 12        self-determination.13            (ii) The 2024 enhanced integration mandate under 14        Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act strengthens and 15        clarifies the requirement that all entities receiving 16        federal financial assistance provide services to 17        individuals with disabilities in the most integrated 18        setting appropriate to their needs, aligning Section 19        504 enforcement with the integration principles of the 20        Americans with Disabilities Act and Olmstead v. L.C.21            (iii) The 2024 CMS Home and Community-Based 22        Services Final Rule updates and expands upon the 2014 23        rule by reinforcing requirements for person-centered 24        planning, informed choice (including meaningful 25        opportunity to explore and visit service and housing 26        options), community integration, and quality   HB5605- 9 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        oversight. The rule emphasizes equitable access to 2        integrated housing and employment, strengthened 3        accountability systems, and workforce stabilization to 4        ensure meaningful outcomes that promote independence, 5        inclusion, community belonging, and choice.6    (3) Supreme Court and consent decree guidance.7        (A) Olmstead v. L.C., 527 U.S. 581 (1999) The U.S. 8    Supreme Court held that the unjustified segregation of 9    individuals with disabilities constitutes discrimination 10    in violation of the Americans with Disabilities Act (ADA) 11    and that states are required to provide services in the 12    most integrated setting appropriate to the needs of 13    individuals with disabilities, which is a very different 14    standard from the special education standard from 1975 of 15    "least restrictive environment".16        (B) The Ligas v. Maram Consent Decree (N.D. Ill. 2011) 17    mandates that the State of Illinois ensures meaningful 18    opportunities for individuals with developmental 19    disabilities to transition from institutional settings to 20    community-based living arrangements, and to avoid 21    unnecessary institutionalization, consistent with the 22    requirements of the Americans with Disabilities Act and 23    the principles articulated in Olmstead.24        (C) Compliance with Olmstead and the Ligas Consent 25    Decree requires the availability of an array of 26    community-based residential service options that can   HB5605- 10 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    support all individuals, including those with complex 2    medical, physical, or behavioral needs in integrated 3    settings of their choice with appropriate safeguards for 4    health and welfare.5    (4) Person-centered planning and dignity of risk.6        (A) Person-centered planning, as required under 7    federal Home and Community-Based Services regulations 8    promulgated in 2014 (42 CFR 441.301(c)), is essential to 9    ensure that individuals can make informed choices about 10    their services, supports, and daily lives based upon their 11    individual strengths, preferences, and interests. Such 12    informed choice requires that the service system make 13    available and accessible the full range of federally 14    authorized home- and community-based service options, so 15    that individuals and, when appropriate, their families or 16    representatives, may understand, consider, and select 17    among those options.18        (B) The principle of dignity of risk recognizes that 19    individuals have the right to make informed decisions, 20    including those involving risk, while maintaining 21    appropriate safeguards for their health, safety, and 22    well-being.23    (5) Workforce importance and challenges.24        (A) Well-trained personnel, including direct support 25    professionals, Qualified Intellectual/Developmental 26    Disabilities Professionals, and Independent Service   HB5605- 11 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    Coordinators, are essential to the effective provision of 2    individualized supports that produce measurable quality of 3    life outcomes and ensure provider accountability.4        (B) Workforce shortages of trained, competent direct 5    support professionals and specialized staff present a 6    significant barrier to achieving the goals of community 7    integration, independence, and person-centered supports 8    for all individuals with developmental disabilities, 9    particularly individuals with complex support needs. 10        (C) Addressing workforce shortages through enhanced 11    training, certification, compensation, and career 12    development pathways is essential to ensure quality, 13    safety, and continuity of services in community settings. 14    (b) Purposes. The purposes of this Act are to:15    (1) Amend the existing Illinois Adults with Developmental 16Disabilities Home and Community-Based Services Waiver to: 17        (A) add Community Supported Living Arrangements as a 18    residential service category authorized under Section 19    1915(c) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1396n(c)), 20    consistent with federal Home and Community-Based Services 21    authority and CMS service definitions and guidance;22        (B) rename Intermittent Community-Integrated Living 23    Arrangements as Community Supported Living 24    Arrangements-Intermittent; and25        (C) add CSL-24 as a distinct waiver service option for 26    individuals with complex medical, physical, or behavioral   HB5605- 12 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    support needs, in order to ensure access to a viable 2    community-based living option for individuals whose needs 3    cannot be met through intermittent CSL and who do not want 4    congregate facility-based service models.5    (2) Enable eligible individuals to live safely and 6independently in integrated community settings of their choice 7(including a home they own, lease, rent, or a family home) with 8up to 2 housemates of their choosing, supported by 24-hour 9medically or behaviorally competent personnel.10    This standard is consistent with best-practice guidance 11from the Council on Quality and Leadership and national 12outcomes data from the Residential Information Systems Project 13at the University of Minnesota's Institute on Community 14Integration, which demonstrate that individuals with 15developmental disabilities, including those with complex 16support needs, experience better quality of life outcomes in 17person-chosen, non-provider-owned living arrangements with 18three or fewer residents that support health, safety, 19community integration and belonging, and quality of life than 20in provider owned, licensed group homes.21    (3) Ensure services are provided in accordance with 22federal Home and Community-Based Services authority, CMS 23regulations, and state rules while promoting person-centered 24planning, dignity of risk, and full community integration, 25inclusion and belonging.26    (4) Support workforce development, ongoing training, and   HB5605- 13 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1technical assistance, and maintain professional standards and 2certification of competencies, including a code of ethics for 3direct support professionals, Qualified 4Intellectual/Developmental Disabilities Professionals, 5Independent Service Coordinators, nursing staff, and 6employment support personnel.7    (5) Reduce or prevent reliance on institutional or 8congregate settings while enhancing access to 9community-integrated life, personal "informed choice", and 10autonomy.11    (6) Create capacity-building and high-fidelity community 12supports that continue to promote and preserve dignity, 13independence, inclusion, and belonging.14    (7) Require independent external evaluation of the program 15(such as by the University of Illinois Chicago or CQL) and 16limit initial enrollment and geographic scope to ensure 17quality supports, accountability, and measurable outcomes.18    (8) Expand Home and Community-Based Services options so 19Illinoisans with complex or intense support needs can live in 20integrated community settings with 24-hour supports, rather 21than in institutions or licensed group homes 22(community-integrated living arrangements), through the 23addition of CSL-24 services to the existing Adults with 24Developmental Disabilities Home and Community-Based Services 25Waiver.26    (c) Legislative intent and interpretation. It is the   HB5605- 14 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1intent of the General Assembly that CSL-24 services be 2available to individuals whose assessed needs cannot be safely 3or sustainably met through existing waiver services, including 4Home-Based Services, and that the receipt of limited, 5intermittent, or insufficient services shall not be construed 6as evidence that an individual's needs are adequately met. 7    Section 3. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    "CMS" means the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 9Services.10    "Community Supported Living Arrangements services" means, 11as defined in federal statute and implementing regulations, 12one or more services provided by a State authorized under this 13Section to assist an individual with a developmental 14disability in activities of daily living necessary to enable 15the individual to live in the individual's own home, 16apartment, family home, or leased or rented dwelling furnished 17in a community supported living arrangement setting. Such 18services may include, but are not limited to:19        (1) Personal assistance services;20        (2) Training and habilitation services necessary to 21    support increased community integration, independence, and 22    productivity;23        (3) Twenty-four-hour emergency assistance, as defined 24    or approved by the Secretary;25        (4) Assistive technology;  HB5605- 15 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        (5) Adaptive equipment;2        (6) Other services approved by the Secretary, except 3    for services excluded under subsection (g) of the 4    authorizing statute; and5        (7) Support services necessary to enable participation 6    in community activities.7    The terms "Community Supported Living" and "Community 8Supported Living Arrangements" are used interchangeably and 9refer to the same federally authorized service category under 10Section 1915(c).11    "Community Supported Living-Intermittent" means the 12service formerly known as Intermittent Community Integrated 13Living Arrangement under the Illinois Adults with 14Developmental Disabilities Home and Community-Based Services 15Waiver, providing less than 24-hour staff support in an 16individual's own home or apartment.17    Community Supported Living-Intermittent services are 18aligned with Community Supported Living Arrangements authority 19under 42 U.S.C. 1396n(c) and the Home and Community-Based 20Services requirements at 42 CFR 441.301 and are intended for 21individuals whose assessed needs do not require continuous or 2224-hour supervision or clinical oversight.23    Community Supported Living-Intermittent services do not 24include provider responsibility for continuous or 24-hour 25staffing or clinical oversight.26    "Community Supported Living-24 Hour" or "CSL-24" means a   HB5605- 16 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1provider-delivered Community Supported Living Arrangement 2service, subject to certification, qualification, and 3oversight requirements established by the Department added to 4the Illinois Adults with Developmental Disabilities Home and 5Community-Based Services Waiver, providing continuous, 24-hour 6availability of trained direct support, supervision, and 7clinical oversight, as identified in the individual's 8Person-Centered Plan.9    CSL-24 services are authorized under Section 1915(c) of 10the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1396n(c)) and 42 CFR 11441.301, and are designed to support individuals with intense 12physical, medical, or complex behavioral support needs to live 13in their own home, leased or rented apartment, or family home.14    CSL-24 services include full provider responsibility for 15health and welfare, staffing, nursing delegation, and 16behavioral supports as specified in the Person-Centered Plan.17    CSL-24 services shall not be subject to funding caps 18applicable to intermittent or congregate residential services 19and shall be authorized based on validated assessment results, 20including a required health and safety risk assessment such as 21the Health Risk Screening Tool, together with a comprehensive 22Person-Centered Plan developed by a trained Independent 23Service Coordinator in compliance with federal person-centered 24planning requirements under the 2014 Home and Community-Based 25Services Settings Rule.26    Assessment requirements for CSL-24 services shall be   HB5605- 17 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1distinct from, and shall not alter assessment or eligibility 2requirements applicable to other waiver services.3    CSL-24 services shall not be considered Residential 4Habilitation, Community-Integrated Living Arrangements, or any 5congregate residential service model, and shall not be subject 6to provider-owned or provider-controlled housing, site-based 7occupancy assumptions, or group residential staffing 8methodologies.9    "Intense physical and medical support needs" means the 10needs of an individual requiring frequent or continuous 11support, supervision, or nursing intervention or delegation to 12manage conditions such as seizures, respiratory support, 13enteral feeding, positioning, medication administration, or 14other significant health-related interventions, consistent 15with the Home and Community-Based Services waiver authority 16under 42 U.S.C. 1396n(c) and 42 CFR 441.301(b)(1)(ii)17    "Intense and complex behavioral support Needs" means the 18needs of an individual who requires structured behavioral 19supports, crisis intervention, or positive behavioral 20strategies due to challenging or high-risk behaviors that 21would otherwise result in institutional placement, consistent 22with service definitions under 42 U.S.C. 1396n(c) and 42 CFR 23441.301(b)(1)(ii).24    "Behavioral Acuity" means the presence of significant 25behavioral support needs that require ongoing supervision, 26intervention, or specialized supports to ensure health,   HB5605- 18 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1safety, and community stability, as demonstrated through 2professional assessment, documented behavioral history, or 3validated behavioral risk or support intensity tools. 4Behavioral acuity may be demonstrated through professional 5assessment, documented behavioral history, Functional 6Behavioral Assessments, Behavior Support Plans, validated 7behavioral risk or support-intensity tools, documented crisis 8events, placement disruption, or other evidence indicating 9moderate to severe behavioral support needs requiring ongoing 10supervision, intervention, or specialized supports regardless 11of whether the individual is currently in crisis.12    "Caregiver collapse" means a situation in which unpaid 13family or informal caregivers are no longer able to safely or 14sustainably provide necessary supports due to age, health, 15exhaustion, or increased support needs of the individual, 16resulting in heightened risk of crisis or institutional 17placement.18    "Person-Centered Plan" means an individualized plan of 19services developed in accordance with Section 1915(c) of the 20Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1396n(c)) and 42 CFR 21441.301(c)(1)-(2), led by the individual and reflecting 22individual's preferences, goals, and desired outcomes. 23    The Person-Centered Plan shall provide sufficient time, 24information, and support for the individual to explore and 25make informed choices regarding housing and living 26arrangements (where they want to live with up to 2   HB5605- 19 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1housemates), required services and supports, providers, and 2short and long-term goals.3    "Enhanced Service Coordination" means an increased level 4of Independent Service Coordination and provider-based case 5management required for individuals with higher assessed 6acuity, including increased frequency of monitoring, 7coordination, documentation, and on-call availability, 8commensurate with the individual's assessed health, safety, 9and supervision risks.10    "Independent Service Coordinator" means an individual 11employed by an Independent Service Coordination agency under 1259 Ill. Adm. Code 120.40(a)(6) and consistent with 42 CFR 13441.301(c), responsible for eligibility determinations, 14facilitation of person-centered planning, and ongoing service 15coordination for individuals with developmental disabilities 16with at least quarterly in-person visits and meetings.17    "Housing navigator" means an individual or entity 18designated or contracted by an Independent Service 19Coordination agency or the Department to assist individuals 20with developmental disabilities in locating, securing, and 21maintaining affordable, and, when necessary, accessible, 22integrated community housing consistent with the individual's 23preferences and outcomes identified through the 24person-centered planning process.25    "Direct support professional" means an individual who 26meets the training and competency requirements established in   HB5605- 20 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b159 Ill. Adm. Code 119 and Section 10 of the Mental Health and 2Developmental Disabilities Administrative Act, and who 3provides habilitation, personal care, or other direct support 4to individuals with developmental disabilities.5    "Qualified Intellectual/Developmental Disabilities 6Professional" means a professional employed by a provider 7agency who meets qualifications described in 42 CFR 8483.430(a)(2) and 59 Ill. Adm. Code 115.10, possesses 9specialized training or experience in supporting individuals 10with intellectual or developmental disabilities, and is 11responsible for implementing the Person-Centered Plan, and 12coordinating services in compliance with federal and state 13requirements. 14    Coordination of services includes but is not limited to: 15        (1) Planning and coordinating services and staff 16    schedules.17        (2) Monitoring health, safety, and well-being, 18    including through remote oversight;19        (3) Arranging transportation and access to community 20    resources.21        (4) Assisting with financial management, bill payment, 22    or home accessibility modifications.23        (5) Coordinating healthcare, therapies, 24    prescriptions, medical appointments, supplies, and durable 25    medical equipment. 26        (6) Full responsibility for daily life coordination.  HB5605- 21 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        (7) Providing on-call support for emergencies.2    On-call support shall be used to ensure safety and 3continuity of care and shall not override the individual's 4autonomy or informed choice.5    "Home and Community-Based Services settings rule" means 6the final rule issued by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 7Services at 79 Federal Register 2947 (January 16, 2014), 8codified at 42 CFR 441.301(c)(4)-(5), 441.530(a)(1)(i), and 9441.710(a)(1)(i), establishing requirements that Home and 10Community-Based Services settings be integrated in the 11community and support individual autonomy, privacy, and access 12to community life and choice of services.13    "Dignity of risk" means the recognition that individuals 14with disabilities have the right to make informed choices 15about their lives, including choices that involve risk, 16consistent with the autonomy, dignity, and choice provisions 17of 42 CFR 441.301(c)(4)(i)-(v) and related CMS guidance. 18    "Money Follows the Person" means the federal program 19authorized under Section 6071 of the Deficit Reduction Act of 202005 (42 U.S.C. 1396a note) as extended by Congress which 21provides enhanced federal matching funds for up to 365 days to 22assist Medicaid beneficiaries in transitioning from 23institutional settings to community-based services.24    "Health Risk Screening Tool" means a validated, nationally 25recognized health and safety risk assessment tool that is 26currently used within Illinois' developmental disabilities   HB5605- 22 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1service system to identify medical, behavioral, and 2environmental risks, including the level of health-related 3support and monitoring necessary to ensure an individual's 4health, safety, and welfare in community-based settings or a 5substantially equivalent successor tool approved by the 6Department.7    "Health Risk Screening Tool level of care" means the level 8of care designation assigned to an individual based on the 9results of the Health Risk Screening Tool, which identifies 10Levels of Care 1 through 6. Levels of Care 4 (extensive), 5 11(pervasive), and 6 (complex) reflect elevated to extreme 12health and safety risk, indicating the need for enhanced 13supports, monitoring, or clinical oversight.14    "Remote support and monitoring technology" means 15non-intrusive, person-centered technology used to support 16health, safety, independence, and community living, including 17but not limited to wearable health monitoring devices, 18environmental sensors, personal emergency response systems, 19medication reminders, and two-way communication technologies.20    Remote support and monitoring technology shall be used 21only with the informed consent of the individual or the 22individual's legally authorized representative, shall be 23integrated into the Person-Centered Plan, and shall not 24include continuous video surveillance or audio monitoring of 25private living spaces.26    "Augmentative and Alternative Communication" means all   HB5605- 23 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1forms of communication other than oral speech that are used to 2express thoughts, needs, wants, and preferences, including but 3not limited to speech-generating devices, communication 4boards, symbol systems, eye-gaze systems, sign language, and 5other low-tech or high-tech communication methods.6    Augmentative and Alternative Communication includes the 7equipment, software, customization, training, and staff 8support necessary to ensure effective, functional 9communication across settings, consistent with the Americans 10with Disabilities Act and Section 504 of the Rehabilitation 11Act.12    "Risk of institutionalization" includes circumstances in 13which existing waiver services are capped, unavailable, 14intermittently staffed, or otherwise insufficient to safely 15meet assessed medical, behavioral, or supervision needs, 16resulting in reliance on unsustainable unpaid caregiving. 17    Section 4. Program established; administration. 18    (a) Administering agency. The Department of Human 19Services, Division of Developmental Disabilities is designated 20as the administering agency and shall work in coordination 21with the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, 22Illinois' single State Medicaid agency, to develop, implement, 23and operate, and to submit, through the Department of 24Healthcare and Family Services, amendments to the Illinois 25Adults with Developmental Disabilities Section 1915(c) Home   HB5605- 24 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1and Community-Based Services Waiver, subject to approval by 2the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services.3    The Department of Human Services, Division of 4Developmental Disabilities shall have delegated authority from 5the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, consistent 6with federal and state law and subject to available 7appropriations, to contract with providers, establish and 8administer rates, certify and monitor providers, and adopt 9implementing rules, subject to approval by the Department of 10Healthcare and Family Services as required for Medicaid 11compliance and federal financial participation.12    Provider licensing, certification, and oversight standards 13for CSL-24 services shall be established by the Department 14consistent with existing State authority for community-based 15residential services, but with the person's own home not 16requiring licensing or Bureau of Accreditation, Licensure and 17Certification reviews, and approved by the State Medicaid 18agency as required for federal financial participation.19    (b) Advisory Council. The Department shall establish and 20convene a Community Supported Living Advisory Council to 21advise the Department on implementation, training, quality 22standards, evaluation findings, and oversight of CSL-24 23services under this Act, as further described in Section 18 of 24this Act.25    (c) Non-interference and independent implementation.26        (1) Nothing in this Act shall be construed to require   HB5605- 25 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    the modification, redesign, consolidation, suspension, or 2    reevaluation of any existing service, rate methodology, 3    eligibility criteria, assessment process, or 4    administrative rule under the Illinois Adults with 5    Developmental Disabilities Home and Community-Based 6    Services Waiver as a condition of implementing CSL-24 7    services.8        (2) The Department shall not delay implementation of 9    CSL-24 services due to proposed, pending, or future 10    changes to other waiver services, assessment tools, rate 11    structures, or administrative processes, except as 12    strictly necessary to obtain federal approval specific to 13    CSL-24.14        (3) CSL-24 services shall be implemented independently 15    of any broader waiver redesign, rate rebasing, assessment 16    reform, or system transformation efforts.17    (d) Implementation timeline.18        (1) Within 180 days after the effective date of this 19    Act, as administratively feasible and subject to receipt 20    of any required federal approvals, the Department shall 21    initiate implementation activities specific to CSL-24 22    services, including but not limited to provider 23    qualification standards, service definitions, and 24    administrative rules necessary to operationalize CSL-24.25        (2) Implementation activities under this subsection 26    shall proceed concurrently with, and not be delayed by,   HB5605- 26 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    unrelated waiver amendments, assessment reforms, rate 2    rebasing efforts, or system redesign initiatives.3        (3) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to 4    require implementation prior to receipt of any federal 5    approvals specific to CSL-24, provided that the Department 6    shall pursue such approvals expeditiously.7    (e) Rate development, cost neutrality, and federal 8approval.9        (1) The Department of Human Services, in coordination 10    with the Department of Healthcare and Family Services, 11    shall establish reimbursement rates for CSL-24 services 12    that reflect the intensity, complexity, and continuous 13    responsibility associated with providing twenty-four-hour 14    staffing, health and welfare oversight, nursing 15    delegation, behavioral supports, and provider 16    accountability, as required under this Act.17        (2) The Department of Human Services and the 18    Department of Healthcare and Family Services shall develop 19    and submit to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 20    Services any required waiver amendments, rate 21    methodologies, cost-effectiveness demonstrations, or 22    cost-neutrality analyses necessary to implement CSL-24 23    services in compliance with Section 1915(c) of the Social 24    Security Act and applicable federal regulations.25        (3) Implementation of CSL-24 services is contingent 26    upon receipt of required federal approvals. Nothing in   HB5605- 27 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    this Act shall be construed to require expenditures in 2    excess of amounts authorized under the approved Medicaid 3    waiver or to constitute an unfunded mandate. 4    Section 5. Eligibility, enrollment, implementation, 5transition, and evaluation. 6    (a) Target population and eligibility; CSL-24. This 7Section applies only to CSL-24 services and shall not modify 8eligibility or access criteria for other waiver services, nor 9be conditioned upon changes to other waiver services or 10assessment systems.11    Eligibility criteria specific to CSL-24 services are used 12solely to determine service appropriateness and authorization 13and shall not establish a separate waiver eligibility 14category, enrollment group, benefit package, or waiver 15authority.16        (1) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 17    require enrollment in CSL-24 services as a condition of 18    accessing other waiver services, or to limit access to 19    less intensive services when appropriate to an 20    individual's assessed needs. Support Needs: 21            (A) The waiver shall serve individuals with 22        documented needs by one or more clinical assessments 23        and qualified professionals, for one or more of the 24        following:25                (i) Intense physical or medical support needs;  HB5605- 28 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1                (ii) Intense or complex behavioral support 2            needs; or3                (iii) Continuous or 24-hour availability of 4            supervision, direct support, or clinical oversight 5            necessary to ensure health, safety, and meaningful 6            community living.7            (B) Individuals eligible for CSL-24 services shall 8        demonstrate, through validated assessment tools, a 9        need for continuous or 24-hour availability of 10        medical, behavioral, or supervisory supports to 11        prevent institutional placement and to support safe, 12        integrated community living.13            (C) An individual shall not be deemed ineligible 14        for CSL-24 services solely because the individual is 15        currently receiving Home-Based Services or other 16        waiver services, when such services are insufficient 17        to meet assessed needs or to prevent risk of 18        institutionalization.19        (2) Risk of Institutionalization; Family Home 20    Eligibility. Individuals shall be eligible if they are at 21    risk of institutionalization or currently residing in:22            (A) State-operated developmental centers;23            (B) Intermediate Care Facilities for Individuals 24        with Intellectual/Developmental Disabilities 25        (ICF/MC/DD); 26            (C) Nursing facilities; or  HB5605- 29 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1            (D) Other institutional or congregate settings.2        (3) Individuals residing in the family home also 3    qualify if they: 4            (A) Are age 22 or older; 5            (B) Would be eligible for institutional placement 6        in the absence of unpaid family caregiving supports, 7        including where caregiver age, health, or 8        sustainability creates a foreseeable risk of 9        placement; or10            (C) Desire to live in a home of their own or remain 11        in the family home with individually tailored supports 12        through CSL-24 services.13        (4) Age and Functional Criteria: Participants must be 14    18 years or older and meet Medicaid institutional 15    level-of-care requirements and applicable waiver-specific 16    functional or medical criteria.17        Assessment: Eligibility and service authorization 18    shall be determined using validated assessment instruments 19    that accurately identify an individual's medical, 20    behavioral, physical, and supervision support needs 21    necessary for safe, community-based living. The 22    instruments must be administered by professional staff who 23    have been trained with documented competency to perform 24    the assessments.25        In determining eligibility for CSL-24 services, the 26    Department shall consider documented behavioral acuity,   HB5605- 30 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    including but not limited to information derived from 2    Functional Behavioral Assessments, Behavior Support Plans, 3    Health Risk Screening Tool behavioral risk indicators, 4    clinical or psychiatric evaluations, and documented 5    incident, crisis, or placement disruption history.6        A health and safety risk assessment, such as the 7    Health Risk Screening Tool, or a substantially similar 8    validated instrument, shall be required for all 9    individuals seeking or receiving CSL-24 services, and for 10    individuals applying through or enrolled in the 11    Prioritization of Urgency of Need for Services (PUNS) 12    process where required by the Department.13        Assessment results shall be used to inform eligibility 14    determinations, service authorization, staffing 15    requirements, and individualized needs-based funding 16    levels. 17        Health Risk Screening Tool results shall not be used 18    as the sole determinant of waiver eligibility and shall be 19    considered in conjunction with person-centered planning, 20    clinical judgment, and other validated assessment 21    information.22        Individuals with a Health Risk Screening Tool Level of 23    Care of 4, 5, or 6 shall be considered to have significant 24    health and safety risk that must be explicitly considered 25    in eligibility determinations and service planning, 26    including consideration for CSL-24 services.  HB5605- 31 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        An individual shall not be denied access to CSL-24 2    services solely due to the timing or completion status of 3    a Health Risk Screening Tool assessment when other 4    evidence demonstrates comparable health or safety risk.5        Assessment results shall not be used to require 6    placement in a congregate, provider-controlled, or 7    institutional setting when community-based supports can 8    reasonably meet the individual's assessed needs and such 9    services must be made available for legal compliance with 10    federal laws and court decisions.11        The Department may utilize additional validated 12    assessment tools, as appropriate, to inform service 13    planning and support intensity. Nothing in this subsection 14    shall be construed to require the use of the Supports 15    Intensity Scale (SIS®) as a condition of eligibility or 16    access to services, provided that the assessment 17    methodology used is validated, nationally recognized, and 18    capable of accurately identifying individual support needs 19    consistent with federal Home and Community-Based Services 20    requirements.21        No eligibility determination, service authorization, 22    staffing level, or funding decision under this Act shall 23    be reduced, delayed, denied, or conditioned based on the 24    assumed availability of unpaid family caregiving, remote 25    support or monitoring technology, community day services, 26    employment services, or other non-residential supports.  HB5605- 32 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        Assessment results, including ICAP and MBI findings, 2    when used solely as supplemental historical context and 3    not as determinative measures, shall be used to inform 4    service intensity and support design and shall not be used 5    as a basis for exclusion or denial of CSL-24 services.6        (5) Service Packet: Individuals seeking CSL-24 7    services shall submit a complete service packet in the 8    form and manner prescribed by the administering agency. 9    (b) Enrollment priority. Priority determinations under 10this subsection apply solely to enrollment sequencing when 11CSL-24 service capacity is temporarily limited and shall not 12affect Medicaid waiver eligibility, service authorization, or 13access to other waiver services.14    Priority shall be applied only among individuals who have 15already been determined eligible for and authorized to receive 16CSL-24 services under the Illinois Adults with Developmental 17Disabilities Home and Community-Based Services Waiver.18    Priority enrollment shall be given to individuals with 19intense support needs who:20    (1) Reside in a family home with a caregiver providing 21primary unpaid supports that are no longer sustainable, 22including individuals whose current waiver services (such as 23Home-Based Services) are inadequate, unavailable, or capped at 24levels insufficient to meet assessed needs, and who would be 25at risk of institutionalization without CSL-24 services; or 26    (2) Are currently in State-operated developmental centers,   HB5605- 33 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1ICF/MC/DD facilities, nursing facilities, or similar 2institutional settings and express a desire to live in the 3community.4    Once determined eligible for CSL-24 services, individuals 5shall not be subject to an additional service-specific waiting 6list beyond temporary capacity limitations addressed through 7phased implementation.8    (c) Written notice of acceptance or rejection.9        (1) Provider agencies shall issue written notice of 10    acceptance or rejection of each complete service packet 11    within 30 calendar days of receipt.12        (2) Notice shall include:13            (A) The specific reasons for acceptance or 14        rejection;15            (B) Identification of any supports required to 16        serve the individual that the provider cannot 17        currently furnish; and18            (C) Instructions for correction, resubmission, or 19        appeal consistent with state and federal Medicaid 20        requirements.21    A provider's inability or refusal to serve an individual 22due to behavioral acuity or support complexity shall not be 23construed as evidence that the individual is ineligible for 24CSL-24 services.25    Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to grant 26provider agencies authority to determine Medicaid eligibility   HB5605- 34 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1or waiver eligibility, which shall remain the responsibility 2of the administering agency.3    (d) Phased rollout for quality and capacity reasons. 4CSL-24 services are established as a permanent service option 5under the Illinois Adults with Developmental Disabilities Home 6and Community-Based Services Waiver. Phased implementation is 7authorized solely for purposes of quality assurance, provider 8capacity development, workforce readiness, and program 9evaluation, and shall not be construed as a pilot, 10demonstration, or temporary program.11        (1) Phase I-Initiation. The purpose of phase I is to 12    ensure quality implementation and data collection prior to 13    statewide expansion. 14            (A) Initial enrollment shall be limited to no more 15        than 250 participants in 4-5 Independent Service 16        Coordination regions including urban, suburban, and 17        rural areas for the first 3 to 5 years.18            (B) Providers must be fully certified and 19        credentialed prior to enrollment of participants, 20        demonstrating compliance with Home and Community-Based 21        Services settings requirements, staff training and 22        competency standards, and program quality benchmarks.23        The initial provider development and capacity-building 24    phase is expected to require 6 to 9 months prior to the 25    enrollment of the first CSL-24 participants.26        Data collected during Phase I shall inform the   HB5605- 35 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    independent external evaluation required for any 2    subsequent expansion.3        (2) Phase II-IV-Expansion. Expansion shall occur 4    contingent upon: 5            (A) Findings from independent external evaluation 6        and implementation of any recommended modifications 7        for improvement;8            (B) Demonstrated provider capacity and readiness; 9        and10            (C) Legislative approval.11    (e) Transition and grandfathering.12        (1) Individuals transitioning from other waivers or 13    institutional settings shall receive continuity of care 14    protections, including:15            (A) No interruption of essential supports during 16        transition;17            (B) Coordination between current and new 18        providers; and19            (C) The ability to transition at any time subject 20        to eligibility and priority criteria.21        (2) Money Follows the Person Utilization Requirement. 22    To the maximum extent permitted under federal law, the 23    Department shall prioritize use of available Money Follows 24    the Person enhanced federal matching funds (approximately 25    75%) for up to 365 days for individuals transitioning from 26    institutional settings into CSL-24 services.  HB5605- 36 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        MFP funds may be used for housing transition costs, 2    start-up expenses, assistive technology, environmental 3    modifications, and other allowable one-time transition 4    supports necessary for safe community living and community 5    belonging.6        Transition planning shall include coordination with 7    available federal transition funding, including Money 8    Follows the Person, consistent with Section 11 of this 9    Act.10    (f) Timeline and reporting.11        (1) The administering agency shall maintain and 12    publish a timeline for waiver submission, provider 13    certification, and phased enrollment.14        (2) Annual progress reports shall be submitted to the 15    General Assembly and the Department of Healthcare and 16    Family Services and shall include:17            (A) Number of participants enrolled;18            (B) Number of transitions completed;19            (C) Compliance with implementation milestones; and20            (D) Annual costs and projected savings.21        Reports shall be segregated by Health Risk Screening 22    Tool Level of Care, documented behavioral acuity or 23    behavioral support needs, age, referral source, prior 24    living arrangement, and referral outcome (accepted, 25    denied, pending), including reasons for denial or delay.   HB5605- 37 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    Section 6. Assessment and level-of-need framework. 2    (a) Scope of application. The assessment and level-of-need 3framework described in this Section applies only to 4individuals seeking or receiving CSL-24 services and shall not 5alter assessment requirements, eligibility criteria, or 6funding methodologies for other services within the Illinois 7Adults with Developmental Disabilities Home and 8Community-Based Services Waiver unless expressly authorized by 9statute.10    (b) Comprehensive person-centered assessment. The 11Department shall ensure that all individuals seeking or 12receiving CSL-24 services receive a comprehensive, 13person-centered assessment that accurately identifies 14functional, behavioral, and supervision support needs 15necessary for safe community-based living.16    (c) Required health and safety risk assessment. The 17Department shall require use of the Health Risk Screening 18Tool, or a substantially similar validated health and safety 19risk assessment, for all individuals seeking or receiving 20services under this Waiver, including individuals applying for 21or enrolled through the Prioritization of Urgency of Need for 22Services (PUNS) process.23    This requirement may be satisfied through the Health Risk 24Screening Tool or through a substantially similar 25State-defined risk assessment methodology, provided that such 26methodology:  HB5605- 38 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        (1) identifies health and safety risks across all 2    hours of the day;3        (2) informs the need for continuous or 24-hour 4    availability of supports;5        (3) identifies required safeguards, staffing patterns, 6    and clinical oversight; 7        (4) is documented in and integrated into the 8    Person-Centered Plan; and9        (5) incorporates behavioral risk and support needs 10    identified through Functional Behavioral Assessments, 11    Behavior Support Plans, or other validated behavioral 12    assessment methodologies, and integrates such findings 13    into the Person-Centered Plan.14    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to require use 15of a specific proprietary tool, provided the assessment 16methodology used meets federal Home and Community-Based 17Services health and welfare assurance requirements.18    (d) Determination of 24-Hour support needs. Assessment 19results shall identify health and safety risks across all 20hours of the day and shall explicitly determine the need for 21continuous or 24-hour availability of supports where 22applicable. 23    Assessment results shall explicitly determine the need for 24continuous or 24-hour availability of supports without 25presuming congregate, facility-based, or provider-controlled 26residential placement based solely on acuity or support   HB5605- 39 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1intensity.2    For individuals with complex medical, physical, or 3behavioral support needs, the assessment shall identify, at 4minimum:5        (1) Medical complexity and nursing-related needs;6        (2) Behavioral interventions, supervision intensity, 7    and related support needs, including staffing skill level 8    and consistency requirements with no use of seclusion or 9    restraints;10        (3) Health and welfare risks across all hours of the 11    day; and12        (4) The need for monitoring, supervision, or clinical 13    supports.14    (e) Role of technology in risk mitigation. Assessment 15results, including Health Risk Screening Tool findings, may be 16used to identify where remote support or monitoring technology 17could mitigate identified health or safety risks or enhance 18early detection of changes in condition, when such technology 19is preferred by the individual and integrated into the 20Person-Centered Plan.21    The availability or use of remote support or monitoring 22technology shall not, by itself, be used to reduce authorized 23staffing or nursing supports, nor to deny eligibility for 24CSL-24 services, when in-person supports are otherwise 25determined to be necessary through person-centered planning.26    (f) Health Risk Screening Tool Levels of care and   HB5605- 40 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1eligibility consideration. Individuals with a Health Risk 2Screening Tool Level of Care of 4, 5, or 6 shall be presumed to 3require consideration of enhanced supports, without presuming 4congregate or institutional placement.5    Health Risk Screening Tool Levels of Care 4, 5, or 6 shall 6be considered in eligibility determinations, service 7authorization, staffing requirements, service coordination 8intensity and individualized funding levels, including 9consideration for CSL-24 services, as identified through the 10person-centered planning process.11    Health Risk Screening Tool Levels of Care inform service 12planning, support intensity, and risk mitigation and do not 13independently determine Medicaid waiver eligibility.14    (g) Use of additional assessment tools. The Department may 15utilize additional validated assessment instruments, including 16tools that measure support intensity or functional needs, to 17inform service planning and funding determinations. All staff 18administering the assessment instruments must be trained and 19certified as competent to provide the assessments with 20fidelity.21    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to require the 22use of the Supports Intensity Scale (SIS®) as a condition of 23eligibility or access to services.24    The use of additional assessment tools shall not result in 25the disregard or devaluation of documented behavioral acuity, 26medical risk, or supervision needs identified through other   HB5605- 41 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1validated assessments.2    (h) Prohibition on reliance on legacy or deficit-based 3tools. The Department shall not rely solely on legacy or 4deficit-based assessment tools such as the Inventory for 5Client and Agency Planning (ICAP), that were developed for 6institutional or congregate models and do not adequately 7capture individualized health risk, supervision needs, or 824-hour community-based support requirements for any 9individual with a disability to be a member of their home 10community with appropriate individualized supports from 11trained and certified competent staff.12    (i) Needs-based funding. Funding for Community Supported 13Living services shall be based on assessed individual need and 14shall not be determined through averaged, capped, or 15population-based funding methodologies.16    Funding determinations shall reflect the risks and 17safeguards identified through required health and safety risk 18assessments, including the need for continuous or 24-hour 19availability of supports.20    Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to exempt 21CSL-24 services from federal waiver cost-neutrality 22requirements, which shall be satisfied through individualized 23budgets and aggregate cost comparisons as required under 24Section 1915(c).25    (j) Prohibition on ICAP-Based rate or staffing 26determinations for CSL-24. Notwithstanding any other provision   HB5605- 42 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1of law, rule, or waiver methodology, the Inventory for Client 2and Agency Planning (ICAP) or other legacy or deficit-based 3instruments shall not be used as the primary basis for 4determining eligibility, staffing levels, service intensity, 5or funding for CSL-24 services.6    No assessment instrument developed primarily for 7institutional or congregate service models shall be used to 8deny access to CSL-24 services or to justify placement in a 9congregate or institutional setting.10    Behavioral complexity or intensity shall not, by itself, 11constitute a basis for denial of eligibility, reduction of 12services, or exclusion from CSL-24 services.13    (k) Reassessment. Reassessments shall occur at least 14annually and whenever a participant's needs materially change.15    (l) Integration with PUNS. The Department shall 16incorporate Health Risk Screening Tool results into the 17Prioritization of Urgency of Need for Services (PUNS) process 18to ensure that individuals with significant health and safety 19risks are accurately identified and prioritized.20    A Health Risk Screening Tool Level of Care of 4, 5, or 6 21shall be recognized as evidence of urgent need due to 22heightened risk of institutionalization, health deterioration, 23or caregiver collapse.24    Behavioral acuity documented through Functional Behavioral 25Assessments, Behavior Support Plans, Health Risk Screening 26Tool behavioral risk indicators, documented crisis or   HB5605- 43 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1placement disruption history, or other validated behavioral 2assessment tools shall be recognized as evidence of urgent 3need when such needs materially increase the risk of 4institutionalization, placement disruption, or caregiver 5collapse.6    (m) Proprietary tool safeguard. Nothing in this Act shall 7be construed to require the use of a specific proprietary 8assessment instrument, provided that any alternative tool used 9is validated, nationally recognized, and capable of accurately 10identifying health, safety, and support needs consistent with 11federal Home and Community-Based Services requirements. 12    Section 7. Covered services. 13    (a) General principles.14        (1) The Illinois Adults with Developmental 15    Disabilities Home and Community-Based Services Waiver, as 16    amended by this Act, shall provide a flexible array of 17    home and community-based services designed to meet each 18    participant's individualized needs and preferences as 19    identified in the Person-Centered Plan.20        (2) Services shall be delivered in accordance with 21    federal Home and Community-Based Services regulations and 22    shall be flexible in type, intensity, and setting to 23    ensure person-centeredness, informed choice, and promote 24    independence, health, and community integration.25        (3) Providers furnishing CSL-24 services shall   HB5605- 44 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    maintain 24/7 emergency and crisis backup coverage to 2    respond to participant health, safety, or behavioral 3    emergencies, especially for individuals with 4    high-intensity medical or behavioral support needs.5        (4) Services authorized under CSL-24 shall not be 6    subject to hourly, daily, weekly, or monthly service caps 7    except as required to ensure compliance with federal 8    waiver cost-neutrality requirements, applicable to other 9    waiver services including indirect staffing, on-call 10    coverage, or supervisory limits, and shall be authorized 11    solely based on assessed individual need and the 12    Person-Centered Plan, except as required for federal 13    waiver cost-neutrality compliance.14        (5) Coordination across residential and day services. 15    Providers of CSL-24 services and Independent Service 16    Coordinators shall coordinate with employment providers, 17    community day providers, and other service entities to 18    ensure continuity of staffing, nursing oversight, 19    behavioral supports, and transportation necessary to 20    support meaningful community participation and belonging 21    throughout the day.22    Service coordination responsibilities shall not be 23fragmented in a manner that results in denial of access to 24employment, community day, or meaningful activities for 25individuals with complex medical, physical, or behavioral 26support needs.  HB5605- 45 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    (b) Covered services shall include, but are not limited 2to, the following:3        (1) Intensive Individualized Service Coordination. 4    This service builds upon the standard Independent Service 5    Coordination function, providing an enhanced level of 6    support for individuals with complex medical, behavioral, 7    or physical support needs who require frequent, proactive 8    coordination to ensure health, safety, and stability in 9    community settings.10            (A) Development and ongoing implementation of a 11        comprehensive Person-Centered Plan including: 12            (i) Assistance in accessing and coordinating 13        necessary medical, behavioral, and integrated and 14        inclusive community-based services and supports.15            (ii) Ongoing monitoring of the individual's 16        health, welfare, and progress toward desired outcomes 17        with increased frequency and intensity as needed to 18        address risks or changes in status.19            (iii) Coordination of transitions between 20        institutional, congregate settings; or other settings 21        into or within Community living arrangements.22            (iv) Development and maintenance of a 24-hour 23        individualized backup and emergency response plan to 24        ensure continuity of support, including identification 25        of formal and informal supports.26            (B) Enhanced service coordination for high-acuity   HB5605- 46 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        individuals. Individuals with a Health Risk Screening 2        Tool Level of Care of 4, 5, or 6, or with documented 3        behavioral acuity as defined in Section 3, shall 4        receive enhanced service coordination, commensurate 5        with assessed acuity and risk, which shall include, at 6        a minimum:7                (i) Increased frequency of Independent Service 8            Coordinator contact, monitoring, and 9            documentation;10                (ii) Lower Independent Service Coordinator 11            caseload ratios proportional to the individual's 12            assessed health, safety, and supervision needs;13                (iii) Proactive coordination of medical, 14            behavioral, nursing, and crisis prevention 15            supports, including coordination across providers 16            and systems of care;17                (iv) Ongoing review of health and safety 18            risks, mitigation strategies, and required 19            adjustments to services or supports; and20                (v) Rapid response coordination during changes 21            in condition, hospitalization, emergency 22            department use, behavioral crises, or other 23            destabilizing events.24            Enhanced Service Coordination under this 25        subsection shall be reflected in rate-setting, 26        staffing expectations, and caseload standards   HB5605- 47 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        applicable to Independent Service Coordination and 2        provider-based case management functions.3        (2) Housing Navigator Services:4            (A) assist the individual in identifying, 5        securing, and maintaining affordable and, when needed, 6        accessible community-based housing aligned with the 7        individual's preferences and Person-Centered Plan.8            (B) Housing Navigator responsibilities include:9                (i) Identifying available, affordable, and 10            accessible housing options and related supports 11            within the individual's preferred communities.12                (ii) Assisting individuals and families with 13            completing housing, leasing, and rental assistance 14            applications, including requests for reasonable 15            accommodations.16                (iii) Developing and maintaining relationships 17            with landlords, property managers, housing 18            developers, public housing authorities, and other 19            community partners to expand integrated housing 20            opportunities.21                (iv) Coordinating with Independent Service 22            Coordination agencies, service providers, housing 23            authorities, and other local partners to support 24            housing searches, applications, transitions, and 25            ongoing tenancy needs.26                (v) Providing tenancy-sustaining supports,   HB5605- 48 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1            including assistance with lease renewals, 2            communication with landlords, and identification 3            of additional services or interventions needed to 4            maintain housing stability.5            All housing-related activities shall comply with 6        the federal Home and Community-Based Services Settings 7        Rule (42 CFR 441.301(c)(4)) and the integration 8        principles affirmed in Olmstead v. L.C.9        (3) Community Supported Living Services, consisting of 10    the following distinct service options:11            (A) Community Supported Living-Intermittent 12        (formerly Intermittent Community-Integrated Living 13        Arrangement) provides less than 24-hour staff support 14        consistent with existing waiver service parameters.15            (B) CSL-24.16        Provides continuous, 24-hour provider responsibility 17    for staffing, supervision, health and welfare, nursing 18    delegation, and behavioral support as identified in the 19    Person-Centered Plan.20        (4) Behavioral stabilization and crisis prevention.21            (A) Services shall be based on non-aversive, 22        positive behavioral interventions and trauma-informed 23        care.24            (B) Restrictive procedures such as seclusion or 25        restraint shall only be used as a last resort, on a 26        temporary and emergency basis and must:  HB5605- 49 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1            (i) Be based on a comprehensive evaluation and 2        recommendations from a professional who is licensed or 3        certified in behavioral management approaches for 4        people with developmental disabilities;5            (ii) Be developed using evidence-based or 6        evidence-informed practices; 7            (iii) Be supported by documented justification; 8        and9            (iv) Be reviewed and approved by an independent 10        human rights committee consistent with State rule and 11        federal CMS guidance.12        (5) Community integration and companion supports.13            (A) Assistance that enables active participation 14        in community-integrated activities.15            (B) One-to-one supports in community settings or 16        home-based supports directly related to community 17        participation, as defined in the Person-Centered Plan.18            (C) Services authorized under CSL-24 shall not be 19        subject to preset hourly, daily, weekly, or monthly 20        service caps. Service intensity and duration shall be 21        authorized solely based on assessed individual need 22        and documented in the Person-Centered Plan.23            (D) Communication Access and Augmentative and 24        Alternative Communication Supports. For individuals 25        who rely on Augmentative and Alternative 26        Communication, services shall include one-to-one   HB5605- 50 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        staffing or dedicated trained staff for communication 2        support when required to ensure the person's right to 3        effective communication, self-direction, and 4        participation in home, community, employment, or 5        meaningful day activities.6        Such supports shall include trained direct support 7    professionals or other staff who are competent in the 8    individual's Augmentative and Alternative Communication 9    system and communication strategies, as documented in the 10    Person-Centered Plan.11        The provision of Augmentative and Alternative 12    Communication devices or technology alone shall not be 13    considered sufficient if the individual requires ongoing 14    or intermittent human support to use the system 15    effectively.16        (6) Skilled nursing services. Licensed nursing 17    services provided on a part-time or intermittent basis, 18    including:19            (A) Health assessment and monitoring;20            (B) Medication management; and21            (C) Nursing care, including delegation to trained 22        DSPs as allowed under State law and the Nurse Practice 23        Act.24        (7) Employment and meaningful day supports.25            (A) Customized employment discovery, profile, 26        plan, job development, systematic instruction, and   HB5605- 51 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        long-term supports (in person or virtual) after 2        employment is secured, when indicated, according to 3        the individual's need for support. 4            (B) A Customized Employment Discovery Profile and 5        Plan shall first be provided through the Division of 6        Rehabilitation Services (DRS), as required under 7        federal vocational rehabilitation and CMS Medicaid 8        Home and Community-Based Services regulations, unless 9        there is documentation that DRS cannot begin the 10        process within 30 days, after which the Home and 11        Community-Based Services waiver can pay for those 12        services. Once there is a Customized Employment plan 13        in place, DRS is obligated to provide or purchase job 14        development and at least 180 days of ongoing support, 15        after which funding for long-term supports is 16        transferred to Home and Community-Based Services.17        (8) Equipment, technology, and environmental 18    modifications.19            (A) Purchase, rental, or maintenance of items, 20        devices, or systems that increase or maintain 21        functional independence, including but not limited to:22            (i) Personal emergency response systems, including 23        installation, maintenance, and monthly response center 24        fees, that enable participants to signal a response 25        center to secure help in an emergency.26            (ii) Home and vehicle accessibility modifications;   HB5605- 52 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        physical changes to a private residence, automobile, 2        or van, necessary to accommodate the participant and 3        improve functional access, safety, or independence. 4            (iii) Assistive technology and durable medical 5        equipment, including the purchase or rent of items, 6        devices, or product systems that increase or maintain 7        a person's functional status and level of 8        independence, including design, fitting, adaptation, 9        maintenance and training or technical assistance 10        related to the use of such equipment.11            (iv) Augmentative and Alternative Communication 12        supports, including speech-generating devices, 13        communication boards, symbol systems, switches and 14        alternative access devices, eye-gaze systems, low-tech 15        and high-tech communication tools, and related 16        software or applications, together with necessary 17        customization, programming, accessories, mounting, 18        maintenance, repair, replacement, and training or 19        technical assistance for the individual and supporting 20        staff, when required to ensure effective 21        communication, informed choice, self-advocacy, health 22        and safety, and participation in home and community 23        life.24            (v) Disposable medical supplies, including 25        nutritional supplements necessary to maintain or 26        improve an individual's health and functional status,   HB5605- 53 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        and to support continued residence in the community.2            (vi) Standard limitation. Except as provided in 3        subparagraph (vii), the total aggregate cost for 4        adaptive equipment, assistive technology, 5        environmental modifications (including home and 6        vehicle accessibility modifications), remote 7        support-equipment, and related installation, 8        maintenance, repair, and monitoring costs shall not 9        exceed the maximum amount otherwise permitted under 10        the Illinois Adults with Developmental Disabilities 11        Section 1915(c) Home and Community-Based Services 12        Waiver, as approved by CMS, or any successor waiver 13        provisions.14            (vii) Enhanced limitation for CSL-24. Subject to 15        CMS approval, for individuals authorized to receive 16        CSL-24 services, the limitation described in 17        subparagraph (vi) shall be increased to an aggregate 18        amount equal to 2 times the maximum amount otherwise 19        permitted under the approved waiver, when such 20        modifications, equipment, or technology are necessary 21        to support health, safety, or continued community 22        living and are documented in the Person-Centered Plan. 23        This enhanced limitation applies only to CSL-24 and 24        shall not alter limits applicable to other waiver 25        services.26            Implementation of this enhanced limitation is   HB5605- 54 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        subject to CMS approval and shall be carried out in a 2        manner consistent with federal waiver cost-neutrality 3        requirements.4            (viii) Remote Support and Monitoring Technology. 5        For individuals receiving CSL-24 services, remote 6        support and monitoring technology may be authorized as 7        a supplemental support when documented in the 8        Person-Centered Plan and determined to enhance safety, 9        independence, or continuity of care.10            Remote supports shall not replace required 11        in-person staffing, nursing oversight, or supervision 12        identified through assessment and person-centered 13        planning, but may be used to supplement supports 14        during periods of stability, overnight hours, or 15        transitions, consistent with individual preference and 16        assessed risk.17        (9) Transportation services. Transportation 18    (accessible as needed) to enable community participation, 19    employment, and access to health care or social 20    activities, as specified in the Person-Centered Plan.21        (10) Extended State Plan Services. Physical therapy, 22    occupational therapy, and speech-language therapy designed 23    to maintain or improve function and to train support 24    staff, as identified in the Person-Centered Plan.25        (11) Institutional Transition Supports (MFP-Aligned). 26    For individuals transitioning from institutional settings   HB5605- 55 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    into CSL-24 services, the Department shall ensure 2    coordination between waiver services and the Money Follows 3    the Person program. Transition planning shall begin prior 4    to discharge and include identification and timely access 5    to MFP-funded transition supports unless the individual is 6    determined ineligible for MFP or MFP funding is 7    unavailable.8        (12) Enhanced community day and meaningful day 9    supports for individuals with complex needs.10            (A) Community day, employment, and meaningful day 11        services shall be available to individuals receiving 12        Community Supported Living-Intermittent or CSL-24 13        services and shall be designed to support full 14        participation in integrated community life.15            (B) For individuals with intense physical, 16        medical, or behavioral support needs, community day 17        and meaningful day services shall include, as 18        identified in the Person-Centered Plan:19                (i) One-to-one or enhanced staffing ratios, 20            including continuous supervision when required for 21            health or safety;22                (ii) Skilled nursing services or nursing 23            oversight, including medication administration, 24            monitoring, and delegation during day activities;25                (iii) Behavioral support staff, crisis 26            prevention supports, and positive behavioral   HB5605- 56 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1            interventions;2                (iv) Transportation supports, including 3            staff-accompanied transportation when required.4            (C) These supports shall be considered integral 5        components of community day and meaningful day 6        services and shall not be denied solely because they 7        are not listed as stand-alone services within the 8        waiver.9            (D) Reimbursement rates for community day and 10        meaningful day services shall include acuity-based 11        rate add-ons to reflect the actual cost of providing 12        one-to-one staffing, nursing supports, and specialized 13        supervision.14            (E) The Department shall comply with the Americans 15        with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C. 12101 et seq.) and 16        Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 17        U.S.C. 794), and shall not exclude any individual from 18        community day or meaningful day services on the basis 19        of disability or disability-related support needs. The 20        Department shall provide reasonable modifications, 21        auxiliary aids, services, and supports necessary to 22        ensure equal access to such services.23            Reasonable modifications shall be provided unless 24        the Department demonstrates that such modifications 25        would fundamentally alter the nature of the service.   HB5605- 57 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    Section 8. Person-centered planning and budgets. 2    (a) Each participant shall have a Person-Centered Plan 3developed and implemented in accordance with federal Home and 4Community-Based Services requirements and the 2014 CMS 5Settings Rule. 6    The Person-Centered Plan shall be led by the participant 7and facilitated by trained facilitators or navigators using 8federally recognized person-centered planning principles, 9including those reflected in the National Center for Advancing 10Person-Centered Practices and Systems. The Person-Centered 11Plan process may include friends, family, and other 12stakeholders and shall:13        (1) document the participant's goals, preferences, 14    strengths, and desired outcomes;15        (2) reflect informed choice among available services, 16    supports, and providers; the Person-Centered Plan shall 17    identify communication needs, including the use of 18    Augmentative and Alternative Communication, and shall 19    specify any required staffing supports necessary to ensure 20    effective communication, informed choice, and 21    self-advocacy across all settings;22        (3) explicitly incorporate the principle of dignity of 23    risk; and24        (4) identify strategies and safeguards necessary to 25    maintain the participant's health, safety, and well-being 26    while respecting autonomy and choice including nursing   HB5605- 58 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    delegation plans (if applicable), required provider 2    response times, staffing patterns, indirect staffing 3    supports, on-call coverage, and community integration 4    plan.5    Meaningful day, community participation, and employment 6integration. For individuals receiving CSL-24 services, the 7Person-Centered Plan shall include goals and preferences 8related to meaningful day activities, community participation, 9or employment, and shall identify the services, staffing, 10nursing supports, behavioral supports, transportation, and 11coordination necessary to support participation across the 12full day. 13    The absence, delay, or limited availability of employment, 14community day, or meaningful day services shall not be used to 15deny, delay, reduce, or terminate access to CSL-24 services.16    (b) Individual budgets. Individual budgets shall be based 17on the participant's assessed level of need, as determined 18through validated assessment instruments and the 19person-centered planning process.20        (1) Budget determinations shall be informed by 21    required health and safety risk assessments, including the 22    Health Risk Screening Tool or a substantially similar 23    validated instrument, as well as documented behavioral 24    assessment levels, and shall not rely on legacy or 25    deficit-based tools, including the Inventory for Client 26    and Agency Planning (ICAP), as the primary basis for   HB5605- 59 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    funding amounts, staffing levels, or service intensity for 2    CSL-24 services.3        (2) Funding shall not be tied to the individual's 4    location, residence type, or provider-operated setting, 5    but shall be directly linked to the supports and services 6    in the individual's own home, identified in the 7    participant's Person-Centered Plan, to be reviewed at 8    least annually.9        (3) Budgets for CSL-24 shall not impose direct or 10    indirect service caps other than those necessary to ensure 11    compliance with federal waiver cost-neutrality 12    requirements, including limits on supervisory staffing, 13    indirect staffing, or on-call coverage, when such supports 14    are necessary to address assessed health, safety, or 15    supervision needs and are documented in the 16    Person-Centered Plan.17        (4) Staff sharing in CSL-24: Person-Centered Plans 18    shall determine whether staff sharing is appropriate based 19    on individual health, safety, and support needs. Overnight 20    staff sharing may be allowed only when it does not 21    compromise individual support, and clear contingency and 22    response protocols are documented in each participant's 23    Person-Centered Plan.24    (c) Cost parameters and CMS cost-effectiveness.25        (1) The State shall establish individualized budgets 26    using an approved, needs-based methodology that reflects   HB5605- 60 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    the participant's assessed medical, behavioral, and 2    physical support requirements.3        (2) Consistent with CMS cost-effectiveness standards 4    for 1915(c) waivers, the State shall ensure that the 5    aggregate costs of services and supports provided to 6    waiver participants do not exceed the aggregate costs of 7    serving an equivalent number of individuals in comparable 8    institutional settings, Intermediate Care Facilities 9    (ICFs/IID).10        (3) The State shall maintain documentation 11    demonstrating cost neutrality in accordance with CMS 12    requirements, including adherence to the approved 13    cost-neutrality formula, and reporting standards.14    (d) Annual review and revision. The administering agency 15shall establish procedures for annual review and revision of 16the Person-Centered Plan and individual budget to ensure 17responsiveness to changes in the participant's needs, goals, 18or circumstances.19    (e) Support adjustments without relocation.20        (1) Changes in a participant's medical, behavioral, 21    physical, or communication needs shall not require 22    relocation from the participant's chosen home, including a 23    family home, apartment, or leased residence.24        (2) When needs decrease or increase, the Department 25    shall adjust services, staffing levels, nursing supports, 26    assistive technology, or other accommodations necessary to   HB5605- 61 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    maintain the individual safely in their existing home 2    whenever possible.3        (3) Increased support needs shall not be used as 4    justification to require placement in a congregate, 5    provider-controlled, or institutional setting.6        (4) Relocation may occur only when requested by the 7    participant or when all reasonable support adjustments 8    have been exhausted and continuation in the current 9    setting would pose a documented, unavoidable risk that 10    cannot be mitigated through additional services and 11    assistive technology.12        (5) Increased support needs, staffing intensity, or 13    service cost shall not be used as justification for 14    relocation, waiver termination, or placement in a 15    congregate or institutional setting.16        (6) Changes in an individual's communication needs, 17    including increased reliance on Augmentative and 18    Alternative Communication, shall be addressed through 19    adjustments to staffing, training, or supports and shall 20    not be used as justification for service reduction, 21    denial, or relocation.22    (f) Participant-Initiated Revisions. Participants shall 23have the right to request revisions to their Person-Centered 24Plan or individual budget at any time when there is a change in 25their condition, circumstances, or personal preferences. The 26administering agency shall respond to such requests in a   HB5605- 62 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1timely manner and provide written notice of approval or 2denial, including the reason for the determination and 3instructions for appeal.4    (g) Independent Service Coordination Oversight. 5Independent Service Coordinators shall conduct at least 6quarterly reviews of Person-Centered Plan implementation for 7individuals receiving CSL-24 services, including verification 8that authorized staffing levels, indirect supports, and 9on-call coverage are being provided as approved and that risk 10mitigation strategies are effective. Findings shall be 11documented and used to inform service adjustments when needed. 12    Section 9. Provider requirements and selection. The 13Department shall implement an initial, phased deployment of 14CSL-24 services with a limited number of qualified providers, 15not to exceed 7, that demonstrate expertise and a documented 16success record with the Department of supporting individuals 17with complex medical or behavioral needs in small, integrated 18community settings serving 4 or fewer individuals.19    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit future 20expansion of qualified providers upon demonstration of 21provider readiness, workforce capacity, and compliance with 22program standards.23    This initial provider limitation is intended solely to 24ensure quality, workforce readiness, and fidelity to 25person-centered, community-based service provision during   HB5605- 63 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1early implementation and shall not be used to restrict 2long-term access, participant choice, long-term provider 3participation, geographic access, or statewide availability of 4CSL-24 services. This initial implementation shall apply only 5to CSL-24 services and shall not limit access to Community 6Supported Living-Intermittent services.7    (a) Provider independence and housing ownership.8        (1) No provider of community-based services under 9    Community Supported Living Arrangements -Intermittent or 10    CSL-24 shall own, lease, manage, or otherwise exercise 11    control over the housing or residential setting in which a 12    participant resides, except as permitted under federal 13    Home and Community-Based Services regulations where the 14    participant retains full tenant rights, meaningful choice, 15    and the ability to select and change service providers 16    independent of housing.17        (2) Housing and services shall be functionally 18    independent to ensure participants' rights to privacy, 19    autonomy, and control over their living environment and to 20    avoid risk of institutionalization.21    (b) Provider qualification, certification and selection.22        (1) All providers shall meet the qualification 23    standards established by the administering agency and 24    shall demonstrate capacity to deliver services consistent 25    with person-centered planning, informed choice, and 26    community integration requirements with demonstrated   HB5605- 64 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    compliance with the federal Home and Community-Based 2    Services Settings Rule. 3        Qualification standards shall include but not be 4    limited to:5            (A) Minimum quality and performance standards;6            (B) Criminal background and registry checks;7            (C) Evidence-based clinical and nursing protocols;8            (D) Staffing ratios and competency standards;9            (E) Emergency response and backup coverage plans; 10        and11            (F) Medication administration and delegation 12        protocols.13        (2) Participants shall have the right to select from 14    qualified providers and to change providers without 15    penalty.16        (3) The administering agency may limit participation 17    in CSL-24 services to providers that demonstrate 18    specialized competency in supporting individuals with 19    complex medical, physical, or behavioral needs, including 20    nursing delegation, crisis response, and high-acuity 21    staffing capacity, without limiting participant choice 22    among qualified providers.23        (4) Participant Choice of Provider. Nothing in this 24    Section shall be construed to permit assignment of a 25    provider without the informed choice and consent of the 26    participant or the participant's legally authorized   HB5605- 65 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    representative, consistent with federal Home and 2    Community-Based Services requirements.3    (c) Compliance and corrective action. The administering 4agency shall establish monitoring procedures to ensure 5provider compliance with federal and state Home and 6Community-Based Services settings requirements, the ADA, 7Section 504, and all terms of this Act.8        (1) Providers found to be out of compliance shall be 9    required to implement a corrective action plan within a 10    defined timeframe.11        (2) Failure to achieve compliance within the required 12    period after notice and opportunity to correct may result 13    in suspension, termination, or decertification of the 14    provider's participation in the program.15        (3) Participants affected by provider suspension or 16    termination shall receive timely notice and assistance 17    with transition to another qualified provider of their 18    choice (if desired) to ensure continuity of care and 19    compliance with Olmstead v. L.C. and the Ligas Consent 20    Decree.21    (d) Transparency and public reporting. The administering 22agency shall maintain and publish an annual report and online 23public registry of all approved providers, including:24        (1) current compliance status with Home and 25    Community-Based Services settings and program 26    requirements;  HB5605- 66 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        (2) corrective action plans and resolution status, 2    where applicable; 3        (3) any enforcement actions, suspensions, or 4    terminations taken during the reporting period.5    This information shall be publicly accessible and 6regularly updated to promote accountability, quality 7improvement, and informed participant choice.8    The administering agency shall annually report provider 9capacity limitations, including the number of individuals 10denied services due to staffing, nursing, or acuity-related 11constraints, geographic gaps in provider availability, and 12recommended corrective actions.13    (e) Temporary suspension of new admissions.14        (1) If a provider is determined to be out of 15    compliance with Home and Community-Based Services 16    requirements, participant rights, or quality standards, 17    the administering agency may impose a temporary suspension 18    of new admissions following notice and in accordance with 19    applicable due process requirements.20        (2) The suspension shall remain in effect until the 21    provider demonstrates full compliance through verification 22    by the agency or its designee.23        (3) During such suspension, the agency shall ensure 24    that participants currently served by the provider 25    continue to receive all necessary supports without 26    disruption.  HB5605- 67 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    (f) Provider expansion criteria. The administering agency 2shall establish objective criteria and a transparent process 3for expanding provider participation in CSL-24 services beyond 4the initial implementation phase.5    Such criteria shall consider, at a minimum:6        (1) demonstrated unmet participant need;7        (2) geographic access and equity;8        (3) provider performance and compliance history; and9        (4) workforce capacity and readiness.10    Nothing in this subsection shall require expansion beyond 11the Department's administrative capacity but the Department 12shall ensure that provider participation is not permanently 13limited where unmet need exists. 14    Section 10. Workforce development, training and retention. 15All workforce standards, staffing ratios, caseload 16requirements, training obligations, wage enhancements, and 17workforce-related provisions set forth in this Section apply 18solely to CSL-24 services and shall be implemented subject to 19federal approval, waiver authority, and available 20appropriations.21    Nothing in this Section shall be construed to require 22modification of workforce standards, staffing ratios, wages, 23or caseloads applicable to any other waiver service or 24program.25    (a) Staffing ratios and caseloads.  HB5605- 68 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        (1) The administering agency shall establish minimum 2    direct support professional to participant ratios, based 3    on participant acuity, including medical, physical, and 4    behavioral support needs.5        (2) For high-acuity participants, ratios shall be 6    lower as needed to ensure health, safety, and quality 7    services and supports and quality of life outcomes.8        (3) Nursing supports:9            (A) Participants requiring skilled health care 10        supports shall have access to licensed nursing 11        services for assessment, monitoring, training, and 12        delegation of health-related tasks in accordance with 13        the Illinois Nurse Practice Act and Medicaid 14        requirements.15            (B) Nursing coverage levels shall be determined 16        through the person-centered planning process and 17        informed by validated assessment tools including 18        required health and safety risk assessments such as 19        Health Risk Screening Tool, to ensure appropriate 20        RN/LPN availability for both direct and indirect 21        clinical oversight.22            (C) Providers shall maintain sufficient nursing 23        capacity to ensure timely response to changes in 24        condition, medication management, and emergency 25        situations.26            (D) When nursing delegation is used, DSPs must   HB5605- 69 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        receive competency-based training and supervision by a 2        qualified nurse, consistent with delegation rules and 3        participant safety requirements.4        (4) Qualified Intellectual/Developmental Disabilities 5    Professionals shall have caseloads commensurate with 6    participant acuity. Individuals with Health Risk Screening 7    Tool Levels of Care 4, 5, or 6 shall require lower 8    Qualified Intellectual Disabilities Professional caseload 9    ratios to ensure adequate oversight, coordination, and 10    accountability for health, safety, and quality of life 11    outcomes, with caseload limits to be established in rule 12    and not to exceed a range of 4 to 7 participants unless the 13    Department documents justification based on assessed 14    acuity and risk.15        (5) Providers shall maintain sufficient staffing to 16    ensure 24/7 coverage, including direct support and paid 17    indirect supports and coordination such as planning, 18    monitoring, emergency response, staff coordination, 19    emergency backup staff, and service scheduling.20        (6) Staff sharing and overnight support:21            (A) Staff sharing is permissible only when 22        consistent with each participant's Person-Centered 23        Plan and individual risk assessment.24            (B) Overnight staff may support more than one 25        participant in a household only if:26                (i) All individuals are asleep;  HB5605- 70 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1                (ii) Health and safety monitoring is assured; 2            and3                (iii) Emergency response protocols enable 4            immediate assistance.5    (b) Initial competency-based training and certification.6        (1) All direct support professionals, Qualified 7    Intellectual Disabilities Professionals, and Independent 8    Service Coordinators shall complete mandatory, 9    competency-based initial training and certification prior 10    to providing services.11        (2) The training shall be based on nationally 12    recognized standards, including the College of Direct 13    Support, the National Alliance for Direct Support 14    Professionals Code of Ethics, and the National Center on 15    Advancing Person-Centered Practices and Systems 16    curriculum.17        (3) Initial training shall include, at a minimum, the 18    following core areas:19            (A) Person-centered thinking, planning, and 20        implementation, consistent with National Center on 21        Advancing Person-Centered Practices and Systems and 22        CMS Home and Community-Based Services regulations;23            (B) Positive behavioral supports and non-aversive 24        crisis prevention, including functional behavior 25        understanding and de-escalation strategies;26            (C) Health, safety, and nursing supports,   HB5605- 71 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        including:2                (i) Nursing delegation and medication 3            administration;4                (ii) Health risk screening and monitoring 5            using validated health and safety risk 6            assessments, such as the Health Risk Screening 7            Tool;8                (iii) Prevention and recognition of the "Fatal 9            Five", the 5 leading causes of preventable death 10            among individuals with developmental disabilities, 11            consistent with nationally recognized clinical 12            guidance; 13                (iv) Emergency response and procedures, 14            including fire safety, medical emergencies, and 15            natural disasters;16                (v) Indirect supports and coordination, 17            including service monitoring, scheduling, and 18            communication across providers;19                (vi) Participant rights and Home and 20            Community-Based Services compliance, including 21            privacy, autonomy, choice, and community 22            integration consistent with 42 CFR 441.301(c)(4); 23                (vii) Any additional topics required by the 24            administering agency for compliance with state and 25            federal standards.26    (c) Annual refresher training and competency assessment.  HB5605- 72 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        (1) All direct support professionals, Qualified 2    Intellectual/Developmental Disabilities Professionals, 3    and Independent Service Coordinators shall complete annual 4    refresher training and competency assessments designed to 5    reinforce and update essential skills with improved best 6    practices and advances in assistive technology.7        (2) Annual training shall include, at a minimum, 8    instruction in the following areas:9            (A) Person-centered practices, including review of 10        plan implementation and progress toward individualized 11        outcomes; 12            (B) Health and safety, including updates to Health 13        Risk Screening Tool assessments, medication 14        administration, infection control, and emergency 15        response procedures;16            (C) Positive behavioral supports and 17        trauma-informed care;18            (D) Community participation, belonging, and 19        development of relationships and natural (unpaid) 20        supports;21            (E) Development of profiles and strategies for 22        meaningful community day activities and customized 23        employment;24            (F) Advances in assistive technology and 25        applications that support increased independence and 26        self-determination;   HB5605- 73 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1            (G) Participant rights, appeals, and advocacy, 2        including access to ombuds and grievance procedures;3            (H) Incident reporting and abuse prevention, 4        including identification, mandatory reporting 5        requirements, and documentation protocols;6            (I) Compliance with the Home and Community-Based 7        Services Settings Rule, reinforcing autonomy, 8        integration, privacy, and informed choice; and9            (J) Emerging topics, as identified by the 10        administering agency, including new regulatory 11        updates, assistive technology, or communication 12        supports.13    (d) Workforce stabilization, retention, and incentives. 14The administering agency shall implement programs to promote 15workforce competencies, stability, and retention, through 16competency-based training and performance standards, 17including:18        (1) Wage enhancements and salary floors for direct 19    support professionals and Qualified 20    Intellectual/Developmental Disabilities Professionals 21    serving high-acuity CSL-24 participants.22        (2) Tuition reimbursement, credentialing support, and 23    professional development opportunities.24        (3) Career ladder and mentorship programs.25        (4) Other incentives designed to recruit, retain, and 26    maintain a competent, high-quality workforce in community   HB5605- 74 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    supported living settings to ensure provider 2    accountability for participants' health, safety, and 3    quality of life outcomes.4    Any wage enhancements or salary floors referenced in this 5subsection shall be implemented solely through approved 6reimbursement rates and shall not create obligations beyond 7those authorized under the approved Medicaid waiver.8    (e) Oversight and compliance. The administering agency 9shall:10        (1) monitor adherence to staffing ratios, Qualified 11    Intellectual Disabilities Professional caseload limits, 12    and 24/7 coverage requirements;13        (2) ensure completion of all training and refresher 14    requirements;15        (3) monitor workforce retention and vacancy rates; and16        (4) report annually to the General Assembly and the 17    public, with CSL-24-specific data, on staffing levels, 18    caseload compliance, nursing coverage, training 19    completion, vacancy rates, and workforce stability 20    outcomes. 21    (f) Alignment with Person-Centered Plans and Home and 22Community-Based Services requirements. All staffing, training, 23and retention policies under this Section shall be implemented 24in a manner that ensures:25        (1) full adherence to each participant's 26    Person-Centered Plan, including opportunities to   HB5605- 75 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    experience choices, make informed choices, individualized 2    goals and outcomes, risk and benefit decisions, and 3    required supports;4        (2) provision of indirect supports and coordination, 5    such as scheduling, monitoring, emergency response, and 6    service management, in accordance with participant needs; 7    and8        (3) compliance with federal Home and Community-Based 9    Services rules, including integration, autonomy, privacy, 10    and access to community life. 11    Section 11. Rate-setting and finance. Upfront funding 12authorization is required for implementation of CSL-24 13services, including training and infrastructure investments.14    (a) Rate Methodology. Enhanced rates, staffing ratios, 15nursing supports, and workforce standards described in this 16Act shall apply to CSL-24 services and shall be tiered based on 17assessed acuity.18    Rate methodologies shall explicitly account for enhanced 19service coordination requirements for individuals with higher 20assessed health and safety risk (Health Risk Screening Tool 21Levels of Care 4, 5, or 6), or intensive behavioral support 22needs, including lower caseload ratios, increased monitoring, 23and on-call availability.24    The administering agency shall establish a rate-setting 25methodology that:  HB5605- 76 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        (1) funds services based on each participant's 2    Person-Centered Plan, including all direct and paid 3    indirect supports required to achieve goals and maintain 4    health and safety;5        (2) Residential staffing, supervision, and funding for 6    CSL-24 services shall not be reduced, offset, or 7    conditioned upon assumptions of participation in community 8    day services, employment services, or other 9    non-residential waiver services;10        (3) compensates Qualified Intellectual Disabilities 11    Professionals, Independent Service Coordinators, DSPs, and 12    nursing staff appropriately, reflecting staff training, 13    certification level, supervision responsibilities, and the 14    intensity of coordination and oversight required by 15    assessed acuity; 16        (4) day support cost inclusion. Rates shall account 17    for the full cost of participation in community day and 18    meaningful day activities for individuals with complex 19    needs, including staffing, nursing oversight, 20    transportation, and supervision required during 21    non-residential hours without reducing residential funding 22    levels. Participation in employment, community day, or 23    meaningful day services shall not be required as a 24    condition of maintaining CSL-24 services, nor shall the 25    cost of such services be used to reduce residential, 26    nursing, or coordination funding authorized under an   HB5605- 77 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    individual's Person-Centered Plan; and2        (5) remote support and monitoring technology costs. 3    Costs associated with approved remote support and 4    monitoring technology, including equipment, installation, 5    maintenance, and response services, shall be treated as 6    allowable waiver expenses when authorized in the 7    Person-Centered Plan and shall not be offset by reductions 8    in staffing or nursing supports.9    (b) Rates and staffing assumptions for CSL-24 services may 10not be reduced through administrative rule, provider guidance, 11or operational policy in a manner inconsistent with 12individualized Person-Centered Plans without express statutory 13authorization.14    (c) For purposes of federal Medicaid cost neutrality, 15CSL-24 services shall be evaluated against the cost of 16institutional and congregate care settings from which 17participants would otherwise receive services, including 18ICF/IID facilities, and nursing facilities, and not against 19average per-participant waiver costs for lower-acuity 20populations.21    (d) Fiscal Justification for Enhanced Environmental 22Modifications. The Department shall recognize that enhanced 23funding for home accessibility and environmental modifications 24for individuals receiving CSL-24 services is a cost-effective 25accommodation that reduces hospitalization, emergency 26interventions, caregiver collapse, and reliance on   HB5605- 78 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1institutional placement, and supports compliance with federal 2community integration mandates and Medicaid cost-neutrality 3requirements.4    The enhanced limitation authorized under Section 7 shall 5be incorporated into the waiver amendment submitted to the 6Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services and shall not be 7reduced, restricted, or eliminated through administrative 8rule, rate methodology, provider guidance, or waiver 9operational policy absent express statutory authorization.10    Any reduction of the enhanced limitation applicable to 11CSL-24 services shall require express legislative 12authorization and may not be implemented solely through 13administrative rule, provider guidance, or waiver operational 14policy.15    (e) Medical necessity of environmental and home 16accessibility modifications. Environmental and home 17accessibility modifications authorized for CSL-24 services 18shall be considered medically necessary habilitative supports 19and shall not be reduced, delayed, or denied for reasons of 20budgetary convenience where such action would reasonably be 21expected to increase the risk of hospitalization, property 22damage, personal injury, direct support professional or other 23caregiver collapse, or institutional placement.24    (f) Funding and State match.25        (1) The administering agency shall implement rates in 26    accordance with CMS waiver approval; the state match and   HB5605- 79 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    funding requirements shall follow federal and state 2    regulations.3        (2) All rates must support quality, safety, and the 4    provision of person-centered, community-based services 5    consistent with federal Home and Community-Based Services 6    requirements.7        (3) The Department shall consider the use of Money 8    Follows the Person funding as a transition financing tool 9    that supports waiver cost-effectiveness and reduces 10    reliance on high-cost institutional care.11    (g) Workforce-Linked Incentives.12        (1) Rates may include provisions for wage enhancements 13    or salary floors for DSPs serving high-acuity 14    participants.15        (2) Rates must support training, credentialing, and 16    retention programs to maintain a competent, high-quality 17    workforce, or equivalent ongoing funding must be 18    separately available for these purposes.19    (h) Budget Oversight.20        (1) The administering agency shall periodically review 21    and adjust rates to ensure that 22            (A) funding levels are sufficient to meet 23        participant needs;24            (B) Home and Community-Based Services compliance 25        is maintained;26            (C) Measurable outcomes in health, safety, and   HB5605- 80 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        community integration are achieved; and2            (D) Reinvested savings are fully utilized to 3        strengthen community-based supports and prevent 4        institutional placement.5        (2) Rate Adequacy Review for CSL-24. In conducting 6    reviews under this subsection, the administering agency 7    shall specifically evaluate CSL-24 reimbursement rates to 8    ensure continued alignment with documented participant 9    health, safety, staffing, and clinical support needs, 10    including workforce-related costs and acuity-driven 11    service intensity.12    Such review shall not rely solely on historical averages, 13cost containment targets, or assumptions derived from 14lower-acuity waiver services. 15    Section 12. Quality assurance, monitoring, safeguards, and 16evaluations. 17    (a) Participant rights and appeals.18        (1) Participants shall have the right to appeal any 19    denial of eligibility, service authorization, or change to 20    services, including changes to Person-Centered Plans or 21    budgets.22        (2) Restrictive interventions, if ever necessary, 23    shall require prior external review and approval by a 24    human rights committee and documentation consistent with 25    federal Home and Community-Based Services rules and best   HB5605- 81 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    practices, except in documented emergency situations where 2    post-incident review is required.3        (3) Participants shall have access to an independent 4    ombuds or advocacy system to:5            (A) Support individual rights;6            (B) Ensure due process and fair hearings; and7            (C) Provide assistance during appeals or 8        grievances. 9    (b) Monitoring and compliance10        (1) Providers shall be subject to regular monitoring 11    and audits to ensure compliance with:12            (A) Federal Home and Community-Based Services 13        settings rules and the definitions of Community 14        Supported Living Arrangements services, including full 15        and faithful implementation of each individual's 16        Person-Centered Plan;17            (B) State licensing and regulatory requirements; 18        and19            (C) Program standards established under this Act.20        Monitoring shall include review of staffing levels, 21    service delivery, communication supports, nursing 22    oversight, and safeguards identified in the 23    Person-Centered Plan to verify that authorized services 24    are delivered as approved.25        (2) Providers shall implement health and safety 26    oversight, including:  HB5605- 82 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1            (A) Clinical audits.2            (B) Nursing competency checks.3            (C) Medication administration oversight.4            (D) Emergency response protocols.5        (3) Providers shall maintain incident reporting and 6    abuse prevention systems consistent with state law and 7    federal Home and Community-Based Services assurances, and 8    participants shall have access to independent ombuds or 9    advocacy services to protect rights and ensure 10    accountability.11        (4) Corrective action plans shall be required for 12    providers found out of compliance, including potential 13    suspension, termination, or decertification when 14    deficiencies pose a risk to health, safety, or participant 15    rights.16        (5) Providers shall maintain and submit documentation 17    demonstrating adherence to person-centered practices, 18    staffing requirements, training, and safety protocols.19        (6) The administering agency shall track key 20    performance indicators to monitor program operations and 21    provider compliance. These indicators shall inform 22    oversight, corrective action, and quality improvement 23    efforts. Performance metrics shall be tracked and reviewed 24    annually, including: 25            (A) DSP, behavioral interventionists and nurse 26        vacancy rates.  HB5605- 83 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1            (B) Provider compliance findings and corrective 2        actions.3            (C) Participant safety incidents and resolutions; 4        and5            (D) Participant satisfaction and quality of life 6        indicators.7            (E) Number of participants receiving CSL-24 8        services, by assessed acuity level using validated 9        assessment methodologies. 10        (7) The administering agency shall track and publicly 11    report the number of individuals receiving CSL-24 who are 12    denied access to community day or meaningful day services 13    or customized employment due to staffing, nursing, or 14    support needs, including the reason for denial and length 15    of delay, and shall identify corrective actions to address 16    service gaps. 17    (c) External evaluation and metrics.18        (1) The administering agency shall contract with an 19    independent evaluator (such as University of Illinois 20    Chicago or CQL) to assess program effectiveness and 21    quality of life outcomes.22        (2) Evaluation metrics shall include, at a minimum:23            (A) CQL 21 Personal Outcome Measures or equivalent 24        quality of life metrics;25            (B) Health outcomes, including rates of 26        hospitalization, emergency department utilization, and   HB5605- 84 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        preventable medical events, including indicators 2        associated with preventable morbidity and mortality 3        commonly referred to in national best practice as the 4        "Fatal Five," or comparable evidence-based risk 5        frameworks used to identify leading causes of 6        preventable death among individuals with developmental 7        disabilities;8            (C) Community integration outcomes, including 9        participation, social inclusion and belonging, and 10        employment;11            (D) Institutional placements avoided, including 12        transitions from State-operated developmental centers, 13        Intermediate Care Facilities, nursing facilities, or 14        other congregate settings;15            (E) Service utilization and acuity measures based 16        on validated assessment tools;17            (F) Use and effectiveness of Specialized Service 18        Teams where applicable;19            (G) Number of individuals transitioned from 20        Short-Term Stabilization Homes; 21            (H) Access to and outcomes from mental and 22        behavioral health services;23            (I) Changes in utilization of Medicaid-funded 24        health care services, including primary care, mental 25        health services, emergency department visits, and 26        hospitalizations;  HB5605- 85 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1            (J) Enhanced quality of life outcomes, including 2        self-determination, stability, and meaningful daily 3        activity;4            (K) Participant and family satisfaction;5            (L) Workforce stability and competency; and6            (M) Cost per participant compared to institutional 7        care.8        (3) Evaluation schedule:9            (A) Annual formative review: Ongoing assessment of 10        program operations, staffing, and outcome trends.11            (B) Year 3 evaluation: Assess impact on 12        institutionalization census rates, participant health 13        outcomes, program costs, and overall effectiveness.14            (C) Year 5 comprehensive evaluation: Assess 15        long-term impact on institutionalization, health and 16        quality of life outcomes, and costs; provide 17        recommendations for program improvements and statewide 18        expansion.19    (d) Data Collection and Public Reporting.20        (1) The administering agency shall publish annual 21    public reports that include: 22            (A) Acceptance, rejection, and termination rates 23        of service providers, including a summary of the 24        reasons for which individuals were rejected or 25        terminated.26            (B) Waitlist counts and demographics.  HB5605- 86 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1            (C) Aggregate outcome data, service utilization, 2        fiscal information, participant demographics, 3        enrollment counts, and service mix.4            (D) Health and community integration outcomes.5            (E) Findings from external evaluations.6            (F) The number of individuals transitioning from 7        State-operated developmental centers, nursing 8        facilities, and other institutional settings into 9        CSL-24 services using Money Follows the Person 10        funding, including the average time from referral to 11        community living to living in the community.12        (2) Reports shall be submitted annually to:13            (A) The General Assembly; and14            (B) The Department of Healthcare and Family 15        Services.16    (e) Legislative Oversight and Corrective Action Reporting. 17If annual reporting demonstrates a pattern of denials, delays, 18or service gaps for individuals with documented medical or 19behavioral acuity, the Department shall report to the General 20Assembly the corrective actions taken and any recommended 21statutory or administrative changes necessary to ensure 22compliance with federal integration and Home and 23Community-Based Services requirements. 24    Section 13. Participant rights and protections. 25    (a) There shall be a guarantee of a process and time for   HB5605- 87 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1informed choice and consent, meaningful and effective 2communication, dignity and human rights, access to personal 3property, control over daily schedules, and protections from 4isolation or restrictive practices in all services and 5settings established under this Act.6    (b) The right to dignity of risk shall be protected, 7including the right to make informed decisions, to refuse 8services, and to appeal decisions without retaliation.9    (c) Individualized restrictive procedure protocols and 10prior external review are required before any restrictive 11intervention, except in documented emergency situations 12subject to post-incident review, and emphasize non-aversive, 13trauma-informed practices.14    (d) Participants shall retain all rights guaranteed under 15the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Code and the 16Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities Confidentiality 17Act, including rights to dignity, autonomy, due process, 18informed consent, and the confidentiality of personal and 19medical information. These rights shall apply fully to all 20Community Supported Living-Intermittent and CSL-24 services, 21providers, and settings established under this Act.22    (e) There shall be privacy protections for remote 23supports. Any use of remote support or monitoring technology 24shall comply with federal Home and Community-Based Services 25privacy, autonomy, and dignity requirements. Individuals shall 26have the right to decline or discontinue use of such   HB5605- 88 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1technology at any time without penalty or loss of services. 2    Section 14. Housing and settings requirements, 3    (a) Community-integrated housing.4        (1) Waiver services, with assistance from the Housing 5    Navigator and Independent Service Coordinator, shall 6    support individuals to live in affordable, accessible when 7    needed, integrated, community-based housing that the 8    individual owns, leases, rents, or otherwise controls, 9    consistent with the individual's preferences and 10    Person-Centered Plan.11        (2) Participants shall have freedom of movement and 12    access to community life comparable to that of individuals 13    without disabilities. Housing arrangements shall ensure 14    full tenant rights, including control over:15            (A) Leases and utilities;16            (B) Visitors;17            (C) Daily schedules and activities;18            (D) Privacy and personal property, including 19        telephones and computers; and20            (E) Choice of one or 2 housemates, if desired.21        (3) Participants shall have the right to use assistive 22    technology, adaptive equipment, and communication or 23    mobility devices of their choice in their home and 24    community, consistent with their Person-Centered Plan.25        (4) Housing shall not be owned, leased, or otherwise   HB5605- 89 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    controlled by the service provider, consistent with the 2    federal Home and Community-Based Services Settings Rule, 3    to prevent replication of institutional or congregate 4    models. Housing arrangements for CSL-24 participants shall 5    not be structured, clustered, or financed in a manner that 6    replicates congregate residential models or limits 7    individual choice of residence.8        Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to 9    prohibit a provider from providing or coordinating 10    services in a residence that is owned, leased, or 11    controlled by the participant or the participant's family.12        (5) CSL-24 services shall not be provided in settings 13    designed, financed, or operated in a manner that 14    functionally replicates congregate or institutional 15    residential models, including clustered housing 16    arrangements established primarily for programmatic 17    convenience rather than individual choice.18    (b) Accessible and affordable housing.19        (1) The administering agency shall encourage 20    collaboration with the Illinois Housing Development 21    Authority (IHDA) and other housing authorities to identify 22    and secure accessible, affordable housing for 23    participants.24        (2) Housing supports may include home modifications, 25    accessibility improvements, or rental assistance as needed 26    to enable safe, independent living, and shall include   HB5605- 90 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    reasonable accommodations required under the Americans 2    with Disabilities Act and Section 504 of the 3    Rehabilitation Act.4    (c) Integration with person-centered planning. Housing 5choices shall be incorporated into the Person-Centered Plan, 6ensuring that participants' preferences, goals, and community 7integration needs are fully considered.8    (d) Stability and responsiveness to changing needs.9        (1) Housing arrangements established under this waiver 10    shall not require a participant to relocate solely due to 11    changes in medical, physical, behavioral, or support 12    needs, except at the request of the participant or where 13    continuation would pose an unavoidable and documented risk 14    that cannot be mitigated through reasonable supports.15        (2) When a participant's needs change, the waiver 16    services, including the Person-Centered Plan team, shall 17    adjust supports, staffing levels, and accommodations 18    necessary to maintain the individual's chosen home 19    whenever possible.20        (3) Housing-related supports and services shall be 21    reviewed at least annually, and more frequently upon the 22    request of the participant when significant changes in 23    needs occur.24        (4) The administering agency shall ensure that service 25    providers prioritize continuity of housing, individualized 26    supports, and avoidance of displacement.  HB5605- 91 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    (e) Family Home Protections.2        (1) A family home shall be recognized as a permissible 3    and fully integrated community setting for CSL-24 4    services.5        (2) Receipt of CSL-24 services shall not require a 6    parent, guardian, or family member to vacate the home as a 7    condition of service authorization.8        (3) The presence of family members in the home shall 9    not be construed as incompatible with provider 10    responsibility for health and welfare when roles and 11    responsibilities are clearly defined in the 12    Person-Centered Plan. 13    Section 15. Transition rules; continuity of care. 14    (a) The Department shall establish rules governing the 15voluntary transition of individuals currently receiving 16services in Community-Integrated Living Arrangements, 17Intermediate Care Facilities, nursing facilities, or other 18Medicaid waivers into CSL-24 services. Such rules shall 19include continuity of care protections, individualized 20transition planning requirements, and applicable notice and 21appeal rights to ensure uninterrupted services and safeguards 22for health and welfare.23    (b) Individuals shall be permitted to request a change in 24waiver services, subject to applicable eligibility criteria 25and available service capacity. Individuals shall not be   HB5605- 92 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1penalized, deprioritized, or otherwise disadvantaged solely 2due to prior waiver enrollment, current service type, or 3previous residence when seeking access to CSL-24 services. 4    Section 16. Federal/CMS alignment and waiver authority. 5    (a) The Department of Healthcare and Family Services and 6the Department of Human Services are authorized to submit 7amendments to the Illinois Adults with Developmental 8Disabilities 1915(c) Home and Community-Based Services Waiver 9to add CSL-24 services and to rename Intermittent 10Community-Integrated Living Arrangements as Community 11Supported Living-Intermittent, consistent with federal Home 12and Community-Based Services requirements and subject to 13public notice, stakeholder input, and comment prior to CMS 14submission. 15    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, rule, or 16waiver methodology, the provisions of this Act governing 17CSL-24 services shall supersede any conflicting requirements 18applicable to congregate, facility-based, or intermittent 19residential services under the Illinois Adults with 20Developmental Disabilities Home and Community-Based Services 21Waiver and shall be implemented independently and without 22delay due to unrelated waiver modifications, except where CMS 23approval requires specific sequencing for CSL-24. 24    Section 17. Workforce and recruitment strategy.   HB5605- 93 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    (a) Funding shall be provided for DSP training for complex 2medical and behavioral supports, including competency-based 3curricula, loan repayment or bonus programs, and wage 4incentives.5    (b) Funding shall be provided for training for nurses, 6Independent Service Coordinators, and Qualified Intellectual 7Disabilities Professionals as described in Section 10.8    (c) The administering agency shall develop and maintain a 9workforce shortage contingency plan, including overtime 10protocols, cross-training strategies, and training pipelines 11with community colleges or accredited programs, and to report 12annually on workforce capacity and implementation status. 13    Section 18. Rulemaking, Interagency coordination and 14advisory body. 15    (a) Rulemaking Authority. The Department of Human 16Services, Division of Developmental Disabilities is authorized 17to adopt rules and binding program standards necessary to 18implement this Act and the related waiver amendments, in 19accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, 20including public notice and comment.21    (b) Community Supported Living Advisory Council.22        (1) The Department shall establish a Community 23    Supported Living Advisory Council to provide ongoing, 24    structured oversight and guidance on the design, 25    implementation, operation, and evaluation of CSL-24   HB5605- 94 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    services under this Act and the related Medicaid waiver 2    amendments.3        The Advisory Council shall advise the Department and 4    the Department of Healthcare and Family Services on:5            (A) Waiver design, submission, and CMS approval 6        strategy;7            (B) Implementation timelines and provider 8        readiness;9            (C) Workforce standards, training requirements, 10        and retention strategies;11            (D) Assessment, eligibility, and service 12        authorization policies;13            (E) Quality assurance, health and safety 14        safeguards, and rights protections;15            (F) Housing and community integration compliance; 16        and17            (G) Program outcomes, cost-effectiveness, and 18        system impact.19        The Advisory Council's role shall be ongoing and shall 20    continue throughout the life of the waiver, meeting at 21    least quarterly, and more frequently in year one, unless 22    modified by statute.23        (2) The Advisory Council shall include, at a minimum:24            (A) Self-advocates receiving or eligible for 25        Community Supported Living-Intermittent and CSL-24 26        community-based services;  HB5605- 95 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1            (B) Family members of individuals with complex 2        medical, physical, or behavioral support needs;3            (C) Clinicians with expertise in complex medical 4        supports, behavioral health, nursing delegation, or 5        health risk management;6            (D) Independent Service Coordinators with 7        experience supporting high-acuity individuals in 8        integrated community living;9            (E) Disability rights and advocacy organizations;10            (F) Provider representatives with demonstrated 11        experience supporting individuals with complex needs 12        in non-congregate, community-based settings;13            (G) Labor representatives representing direct 14        support professionals or nursing staff; and15            (H) Academic or research representatives, 16        including from the University of Illinois Chicago or 17        comparable institutions with expertise in disability 18        policy, outcomes, or evaluation.19        To ensure independence and avoid provider dominance, 20    no more than 49% of Council members shall be employees of, 21    or representatives for, provider organizations.22        (3) Authority, duties, and access to information. The 23    Advisory Council shall:24            (A) Review and provide written recommendations on 25        proposed waiver amendments, rules, provider standards, 26        and guidance related to CSL-24 services;  HB5605- 96 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1            (B) Review implementation data, quality metrics, 2        incident trends, workforce indicators, and service 3        access data;4            (C) Advise on corrective actions, policy 5        adjustments, or system improvements necessary to 6        ensure compliance with federal Home and 7        Community-Based Services requirements, the ADA, 8        Section 504, Olmstead, and the Ligas Consent Decree;9            (D) Request and receive from the Department and 10        the Department of Healthcare and Family Services 11        within reasonable timeframes, any non-confidential 12        data reasonably necessary to carry out its duties, 13        including aggregate utilization, cost, and outcome 14        data; and15            (E) Issue non-binding public recommendations to 16        the Department and the General Assembly.17        The Department shall provide a written response to 18    formal recommendations issued by the Advisory Council 19    within 90 days, including any planned actions or reasons 20    for non-adoption.21        (4) Meetings, Reporting, and Transparency.22            (A) The Advisory Council shall meet at least 23        quarterly, with additional meetings as necessary 24        during waiver submission and initial implementation.25            (B) The Department shall provide staff support and 26        ensure timely access to materials necessary for   HB5605- 97 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1        meaningful participation.2            (C) The Advisory Council shall submit an annual 3        written report no later than March 31 of each year to:4                (i) The Governor;5                (ii) The General Assembly;6                (iii) The Department of Human Services; and7                (iv) The Department of Healthcare and Family 8            Services.9            (D) The annual report shall summarize:10                (i) Implementation progress;11                (ii) Identified system barriers or risks;12                (iii) Recommendations for improvement;13                (iv) Workforce and provider capacity concerns; 14            and15                (v) Outcomes related to health, safety, 16            community integration, and avoidance of 17            institutionalization.18            (E) Reports shall be made publicly available, with 19        appropriate protections for individual privacy.20            (F) The Department shall provide a written 21        response to the Advisory Council's annual 22        recommendations within 90 days, identifying actions 23        taken, actions planned, or reasons for non-adoption.24        (5) Conflict of interest and ethics. All members shall 25    comply with applicable State ethics, disclosure, and 26    conflict-of-interest requirements, including annual   HB5605- 98 -LRB104 19549 KTG 32997 b1    disclosure of financial or organizational interests 2    related to services covered under this Act. 3    Section 19. Fiscal impact. The Department of Healthcare 4and Family Services and the Department of Human Services, 5Division of Developmental Disabilities shall provide a fiscal 6impact statement estimating first 3 years of program costs, 7including start-up (IT, provider competencies, and capacity), 8ongoing provider rates, administrative and oversight costs, 9and projected savings from reduced institutional care. 10    Section 20. Implementation timelines. Initial provider 11selection and enrollment in training shall occur within 4 12months following CMS approval, subject to provider readiness 13and certification requirements. 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.